Marriage and Divorce: Changes and
their Driving Forces
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers
The family is not a static institution. In recent decades, marriage rates have
fallen, divorce rates have risen, and the defining characteristics of marriage have changed. The economic approach to the family seeks to
explain these trends by reference to models that can also explain how and why
families form. Gary Becker’s (1981) Treatise on the Family proposed a theory based
on “production complementarities,” in which husband and wife specialize in the
market and domestic spheres, respectively. Production complementarities also
arise in the production and rearing of one’s own children. However, production
complementarities—at least as initially described—are decreasingly central to modern family life. Increased longevity and declining fertility mean that most of one’s
adult life is spent without one’s own children in the household. Also, the rise in
marital formation at older ages, including remarriage, means that many families
form with no intention of producing children. Moreover, increases in female labor
force participation suggest that household specialization has either declined or, at
least taken on a different meaning.
These changes have come about as what is produced in the home has been
dramatically altered both by the emergence of labor-saving technology in the home
and by the development of service industries that allow much of what was once
provided by specialized homemakers to be purchased in the market. The availabily Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers are both Assistant Professors of Business and Public
Policy, Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Wolfers is
also Faculty Research Fellow, National Bureau of Economic Research, Cambridge, Massachusetts; Research Affiliate, Centre for Economic Policy Research, London, United Kingdom;
and Research Fellow, Institute for the Study of Labor (IZA), Bonn, Germany. Their e-mail
addresses are betsey.stevenson@wharton.upenn.edu and jwolfers@wharton.upenn.edu,
respectively.
Journal of Economic Perspectives—Volume 21, Number 2—Spring 2007—Pages 27–52
ity of birth control and abortion has affected the potential consequences of sex
both in and out of marriage, while changes in divorce laws have altered the terms
of the marital bargain. These forces also have important feedback effects, changing
the pool of marriageable singles across the age distribution, thereby affecting
search, marriage, remarriage, and the extent of “churning” in the marriage market.
To remain relevant to the twenty-first century, the economics of the family will
need to push beyond the production of own children and traditional notions of
specialization, and seek to uncover the forces that yield the modern family form.
This may mean reconceiving the notion of household production or, as we argue,
extending models of the family beyond the notion of a household-based firm and
toward emphasizing motivations such as consumption complementarities and insurance as central to marriage. Furthermore, the economic theory of the family as
originally developed was a theory of household formation, rather than a theory of
legal marriage. Couples have become increasingly likely to form households without entering into a marriage, adding a new dimension for considering decisions
surrounding family formation. This article lays the groundwork for a reconsideration of the theory of the family by describing the tremendous changes in family
forms related to marriage and divorce, pointing to some of their driving forces, and
suggesting ways of expanding our thinking about the family to understand its future
better.
Trends in Marriage and Divorce
Figure 1 lays out some facts about marriage and divorce in the United States
over the last 150 years: the divorce rate—measured as the number of new divorces
each year on a per capita basis—has risen, while the marriage rate has fluctuated
around a relatively stable mean. The timing of these changes suggests that social
and economic factors strongly influence the marriage market. Marriage rates rose
during, and in the wake of, the two world wars and fell during the Great Depression. The divorce rate fell during the Depression and spiked following World
War II.
Developments since the 1960s appear to reflect more subtle influences, and
have been the focus of heated political debate. Divorce rates rose sharply, doubling
between the mid-1960s and the mid-1970s. During this period, family life was
potentially altered by many factors: the rise of the women’s liberation movement;
the sexual revolution; the Supreme Court’s granting of marriage as a “fundamental” right under the U.S. Constitution and thus the abolition of laws restricting
marriage between races; the elimination in many states of fault-based divorce; and
a sharp rise in women’s labor force participation. Yet when viewed over a longer
time period, we see that while the 1970s had exceptionally high divorce rates, the
low divorce rates in previous decades were also somewhat exceptional. Fitting a
simple trend line to the divorce rate between 1860 and 1945 (thereby excluding the
post–World War II surge in divorce) as shown in Figure 1, suggests that some of the
28 Journal of Economic Perspectives
run-up in divorce in the latter third of the twentieth century reflects the divorce
rate simply reverting to levels consistent with earlier trends, following unusually low
divorce in the 1950s and early 1960s. Indeed, based on extrapolation, family
scholars as early as the turn of the last century had predicted future divorce rates
like those actually witnessed in the 1980s (Coontz, 2005). While the 1970s overshot
the trend, the subsequent fall in divorce has put the divorce rate back on the trend
line, and by 2005, the annual divorce rate projected by the pre-1946 trend is quite
close to actual divorce rates.
Figure 1 also points to a remarkable and often overlooked fact: the divorce rate
per thousand people actually peaked in 1981, and has been declining over the
ensuing quarter century. The divorce rate in 2005—3.6 divorces per thousand
people—is at its lowest level since 1970. The number of people entering marriage
as a proportion of the population in the United States has also been falling for the
past 25 years, and the marriage rate is currently at its lowest point in recorded
history. Marriage rates rose as the divorce rate rose, but reached an earlier peak in
1972. Yet even when measuring the number of divorces relative to the “at-risk
population” (that is, those who are currently married), we see a similar decline in
the divorce rate over the last 25 years, falling from a peak of 22.8 divorces per
1,000 married couples in 1979 to 16.7 in 2005. The sustained decline in divorce
over the past quarter century provides an ideal testing ground for assessing the
Figure 1
Marriages and Divorces per Thousand People, United States 1860–2005
0
5
10
15
20
25
Annual rates
1860 1880 1900 1920 1940 1960 1980 2000
Year
Marriage rate: new marriages per
thousand people
Divorce rate: new divorces per
thousand people
Divorces per thousand married couples
Extrapolating 1860–1945 trend in divorce
Sources: Data for 1860–1919 are from Jacobson (1959); 1920–1998 from Carter et al. (2006); 1999–
2005 from U.S. Census Bureau (2007).
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 29
validity of alternative theories of why the divorce rate rose in the late 1960s and into
the 1970s; unfortunately, such tests are mostly absent from the existing literature.
Figure 2 analyzes data from marital histories to assess the fate of first marriages,
grouping them by the decade in which the wedding occurred. For those marriages
that occurred in the 1950s through the 1970s, we know a lot about their eventual
outcomes, and the figure clearly shows that the probability of divorce before each
anniversary rose for each successive marriage cohort until the 1970s. For marriages
that occurred in the 1970s, 48 percent had dissolved within 25 years, roughly
confirming—for this specific cohort—the popular claim that “half of all marriages
end in divorce.”1 Yet for first marriages that occurred in the 1980s, the proportion
that had dissolved by each anniversary was consistently lower, and it is lower again
for marriages that occurred in the 1990s. While it will take several more decades for
the long-term fate of recent marriages to be realized, it appears likely that fewer
than half of these recent marriages will dissolve.
Much of the concern over the high divorce rates in the 1970s stemmed from
the impact of divorce on children. Indeed, as divorce rose in the 1960s and 1970s,
so too did the number of children involved in each divorce. In the 1950s, the
average divorce involved 0.78 children; by 1968 that number had risen to 1.34.
However, since 1968, the average number of children involved in each divorce has
fallen dramatically, and in 1995 the average was 0.91, only slightly above the 1950
average. Similar patterns are evident in data on the proportion of divorces that
involve any children. While the collection of detailed national divorce statistics
ceased in 1995, recent data from individual states suggest that the number of
children involved in divorce has continued to decline over the subsequent decade.
There exists substantial controversy—and uncertainty—about the impact of
divorce on children. While children from divorced households fare worse along a
range of outcomes than those from intact households, this observation does not
speak to the policy-relevant question of whether those children would have been
better off if their parents had not divorced. The conflict in these households may
be so severe that children are actually better served by their parents divorcing. Thus
comparisons of the “happily married” with the “unhappily divorced” are likely
irrelevant for those choosing between an unhappy marriage and an unhappy
divorce. Moreover, the difficulty in establishing a causal link between divorce
decisions and children’s outcomes is compounded by the possibility that the type of
parents and households that end up divorced are likely to be different from those
that do not. These differences may themselves lead to worse outcomes for children
1 There are many alternative sources for this claim. The simplest approach is to take the ratio of the
number of divorces to the number of marriages, which would correspond to the proportion of marriages
ending in divorce if the marriage market were in a steady state (an assumption that Figure 1 shows to
be markedly false). “Life tables” offer a somewhat more refined, but related approach, adding agespecific divorce rates to come up with the probability that a marriage ends in divorce. This approach
effectively simulates the likely course of a cohort were age-specific divorce rates measured at a point in
time to remain unchanged. Yet as Figure 2 makes clear, there are strong cohort-specific influences on
these rates, confounding such an inference.
30 Journal of Economic Perspectives
even if the parents were to remain married. Additionally, unobserved negative
shocks to the family may both lead to divorce, and to negative outcomes for
children, further confounding attempts at causal inference.
With entry into marriage falling, but exit through divorce also falling, what has
happened to the proportion of the population living in a married relationship?
Figure 3 shows the proportion of the population currently married, by age, for
every-other-decade, from 1880 to the present. Four striking patterns emerge from
this analysis. First, the proportion married at each age has been surprisingly stable
over more than a century; the pattern in 1980, for instance, is remarkably similar
to that in 1880. Second, consistent with our earlier analysis, the 1960s were unusual,
reflecting not only more marriage, but earlier marriage. Third, the data for 2000
suggest a very different pattern, with marriage less prevalent among young adults,
but more prevalent among those at older ages. This trend toward rising age at first
marriage represents both a return to, and a departure from, earlier patterns. The
return to earlier patterns is the later age at which men first marry; in 1890, the
median age at which men first married was 26, declining to 23 by the mid-1950s,
and then returning to 27 in 2004. The departure is that the age gap between men
and women has declined through the past century, with the median age at which
women first marry rising from 22 in 1890 to 26 in 2004 (U.S. Census Bureau, 2005).
This shrinking gap between the ages of husbands and wives helps explain the
fourth striking fact in Figure 3: Those over 65 are now much more likely to be
married than at any other time in the past. In fact, those over 65 are now as likely
Figure 2
First Marriages Ending in Divorce, by Year of Marriage
1950–59
1960–69
1970–79
1980–89
1990–99
0
.1
.2
.3
.4
.5
.6
Proportion of marriages ending in divorce
conditional on being married but not widowed
0 5 10 15 20 25
Years since wedding
Source: Retrospective marital histories recorded in the 2001 Survey of Income and Program
Participation.
Marriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 31
to be married as are those aged 16 to 65. The larger proportion of people married
at older ages reflects greater life expectancy for both men and women and a
decreasing gap in the difference between men’s and women’s life expectancy.
Additionally, some of this increase in the proportion of those over 65 who are
married stems from an increase in the proportion marrying at older ages, with
these later-age marriages potentially being facilitated by a thicker remarriage
market in recent decades that allows greater remarriage following either divorce or
the death of a spouse.
This changing age profile of marriage also points to the declining role of
fertility and child rearing in married life. In 1880, 75 percent of married people
lived in a household in which their own children were present. That proportion has
fallen steadily over the past 125 years, and by 2005 only 41 percent of married
people had their own children present in their household. This dramatic shift
reflects the confluence of many factors, including declining fertility, increased
longevity, increasing rates of marriage at later post-childbearing ages, rising nonmarital births, and rising divorce.
The Marital Life Cycle
Basic statistics on marriage and divorce rates, or age at first marriage, no
longer paint a complete picture of modern family life. Marriage is now likely to be
Figure 3
Percent Married by Age, 1880–2000
0
.2
.4
.6
.8
1
Proportion of population currently married
15 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 85
Age
1880
1900
1920
1940
1960
1980
2000
Source: U.S. Censuses of Population, 1880–2000.
32 Journal of Economic Perspectives
preceded by cohabitation; in many cases, it may be succeeded by divorce and
possibly remarriage, and for some people, further “churn” may follow. Figure 4
illustrates, showing marital status through the life cycle for the 1940–45 birth
cohorts—the most recent group for which complete marital histories through age
55 are available.
By age 30, six out of seven of these men and women had entered into a first
marriage; one-sixth of these marriages had already ended, and of those whose
marriages dissolved, one-half had subsequently remarried. By age 45, only 7 percent
remained never married and around one-third of first marriages had ended. The
share of the previously married population that had subsequently remarried remained around one half. By age 55, all but 5 percent of this cohort had married at
some point, and 53 percent of the population remained in intact first marriages.
Table 1 provides further detail on life-cycle patterns, both comparing the
1940–45 cohort with the cohort born a decade later and exploring variation by
demographic group in the more recent cohort. To allow us to explore this younger
cohort (those born in 1950–55), Table 1 assesses outcomes through to age 45.
Thus, the first two columns compare the 1940–45 birth cohort discussed in the
previous paragraph with the subsequent cohort born between 1950 and 1955.
These data suggest that by age 45, the more recent cohort was less likely to have
married and more likely to have divorced than the preceding cohort. Moreover,
conditional on divorcing, those in the more recent cohort exit their marriages
faster and have slightly lower, but still high, levels of remarriage. Based on life
Figure 4
Marital Status Through the Life Cycle
(cohort born 1940 –1945)
0
.2
.4
.6
.8
1
Marital status: % of cohort
15 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55
Age
Previously married (twice)
Third (or higher) marriage
Previously married (twice)
Remarried (2nd marriage)
Previously married (once)
1st marriage
Never married
Source: U.S. Census, Survey of Income and Program Participation marital history module.
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 33
patterns like these, Cherlin (1981) described the increasingly typical life course as
“marriage, divorce, remarriage.”
As Ellwood and Crane (1990) have noted in this journal (and as a huge
literature in sociology has discussed), there is a stark racial divide in family structure. This difference is evident in Table 1. This racial divide is driven almost entirely
Table 1
Marital Life Cycle: Outcomes by Age 45 across Cohorts, Time, Education,
and Race
By cohort Born 1950–55
Born
1940–45
Born
1950–55
By
gender
By
race
By
education
All All Men Women Black White College grads College
% Ever married 93.1% 89.5% 88.2% 90.7% 77.6% 91.0% 89.5% 89.5%
Among those ever
married:
Average age at first
marriage 22.6 23.6 24.7 22.6 24.7 23.3 24.9 22.8
% still in first
marriage 64.5% 56.6% 59.1% 54.3% 52.7% 56.1% 63.3% 52.6%
% of first
marriages
ending in
divorce 32.7% 40.8% 39.4% 42.0% 42.9% 41.5% 34.8% 44.3%
Among those who
divorced
Average duration
of marriage
(yrs) 10.3 9.0 8.7 9.3 9.7 8.9 9.0 9.1
% remarrying 70.5% 68.9% 71.3% 66.8% 56.8% 70.6% 67.8% 69.4%
Among those
remarrying after
divorce
Average time to
remarriage (yrs) 3.9 4.2 3.9 4.5 4.7 4.2 4.2 4.2
% still in 2nd
marriage 70.7% 62.5% 64.1% 61.0% 58.6% 63.0% 70.2% 59.0%
% of 2nd marriages
ending in
divorce 26.5% 35.7% 35.3% 36.2% 36.1% 35.7% 28.7% 39.0%
Among those whose
2nd marriage ends in
divorce
Average duration
of 2nd marriage
(yrs) 6.7 6.0 6.1 5.9 6.4 6.0 5.7 6.1
% remarrying 49.2% 53.0% 55.8% 50.5% 49.1% 54.1% 49.9% 54.1%
Source: Authors calculations based on retrospective marital histories collected in the 2001 Survey of
Income and Program Participation.
34 Journal of Economic Perspectives
by lower and slower entry into marriage by blacks, rather than by higher or more
rapid divorce. By age 45, nearly one-in-four blacks born between 1950 and 1955 had
never married, while the equivalent statistic for whites was one-in-ten. Yet, among
those marrying, divorce rates for blacks and whites were similar, and blacks in fact
spent more time in their marriages before divorce than whites. As with first
marriage, reentry into marriage among blacks was both rarer, and typically slower
than that of whites.
Figure 5 shows that for much of the first half of the twentieth century, blacks
were in fact more likely than whites to marry. In the 1940s and 1950s, the
proportion of whites who were married rose, closing and ultimately reversing the
racial gap in marriage. The incidence of marriage has subsequently declined for all
groups, but most dramatically among blacks: 71 percent of blacks born in 1945 had
married by age 25, compared with 51 percent of those born in 1955.
While the changing racial gap in the incidence of marriage largely reflects
differences in entry into marriage, not divorce rates, differences across education
levels reflect an emerging “divorce gap.” Table 1 highlights a ten percentage point
gap between college graduates and those with less than a college education in the
probability of a first marriage surviving to age 45, and the higher divorce propensity
among those without a college degree is too large to simply reflect their earlier
entry into marriage. Furthermore, conditional on divorcing, those without a college degree are less likely to remarry, and if they do remarry, they are again more
likely to divorce.
Although the data in Table 1 show similar marriage rates across education
levels, these data hide interesting differences which become evident only when the
data are further disaggregated by gender. For men, those with a college degree are
3 percentage points more likely to have married by age 45 than those without, while
female college graduates are 3 percentage points less likely to have married. Yet,
marriage rates for college-educated women have been rising over time and, while
still below those of their less-educated peers, are at a historic high. In the late
nineteenth century, almost half of all college-educated women never married
(Coontz, 2005). In the 1960 census, 29 percent of the college-educated women in
their 60s had never married. By contrast, four decades later, the corresponding
proportion was only 8 percent. Indeed, highly educated women are now as likely—
and may eventually be more likely—to marry than less-educated women. The
difficulty in comparing marriage rates across education groups is that highlyeducated women marry much later than do those with less education, so comparisons early in the lifespan tend to show that those with less education are more
likely to have married. Even so, the 2004 American Community Survey suggests that
college-educated women between the ages of 35 and 40 were as likely to have ever
married as those without a college degree and were 10 percentage points more
likely to be currently married than their less-educated peers.
Table 1 shows that divorced women are less likely than divorced men to
remarry—a fact that has been pointed to by scholars concerned with women’s
poverty following divorce. Once again, this average masks big differences in remarMarriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 35
riage rates by education (not shown in Table 1). Among those without a college
degree, divorced women are as likely as divorced men to remarry: 71 percent of
both groups have remarried by age 45. In contrast, nearly three-quarters of collegeeducated divorced men remarry, compared with two-thirds of college-educated
divorced women. Contrary to the conventional wisdom that women with the least
resources are less likely to remarry, it appears to be those best equipped to cope
outside of marriage who are more likely to eschew marriage the second time
around.
Cohabitation
So far we have discussed patterns in formal marriage; yet the decision to form
a household with another person is increasingly decoupled from the decision to
marry. In recent decades, cohabitation has emerged as an important institution, as
a precursor to and sometimes as a substitute for marriage. This decoupling of
domestic arrangements from the legal (and social) status of relationships raises
important new questions for economic analysis of the family, as early models
treated marriage and household formation almost identically. Yet these labels also
have substantive economic content, determining the default allocation of property
Figure 5
Racial Differences in Marital Outcomes
% Currently
married
% Currently divorced
0
20
40
60
80
100
Proportion of the population aged 18–45, %
1880 1900 1920 1940 1960 1980 2000
Whites
African-Americans
Current Marital Status
% Ever married
% Ever divorced*
1880 1900 1920 1940 1960 1980 2000
Ever Married or Divorced
Sources: Census 1880–2000; American Community Survey 2004; Ever-divorced from 1910, 1940–1980
census, supplemented by 1990, 1995 Current Population Survey and 2001 Survey of Income and
Program Participation marital history supplements.
Note: * “% Ever divorced” measures currently divorced, or remarried.
36 Journal of Economic Perspectives
rights following separation, tax treatment of the couple, and eligibility for both
social programs and employment-related family benefits. Growing social acceptance of nonmarital relationships and the changing legal institutions surrounding
marriage raise the question: What distinguishes marital relationships from cohabiting relationships, and how has this distinction changed?
However, empirical analysis related to these questions is beset by a difficulty:
until recently, little data existed on nonmarital cohabiting relationships. The
available data documenting the rise of cohabitation suggests that levels of cohabitation were low prior to 1970 and have grown at a roughly constant rate since then,
with perhaps faster growth in the past decade. This assessment comes from three
sources. First, in 1995 the Current Population Survey started allowing people to
identify themselves as an “unmarried partner” of the householder (rather than just
“partner/roommate”). These data suggest that cohabitation rates among adults
have risen from 2.9 percent in March 1995 to 4.7 percent in March 2005. Second,
a similar change was made for the Census, which recorded a 3.5 percent cohabitation rate among adults in 1990 and 5 percent in 2000, one-in-nine of whom were
same-sex couples (with roughly equal numbers involving male and female same-sex
couples).2 Finally, for earlier periods, Fitch, Goeken, and Ruggles (2005) analyze
Census data and calculate a proxy measure of cohabitation—the number of Persons of the Opposite Sex Sharing Living Quarters or “POSSLQ”—documenting
virtually no rise in cohabitation between 1880 and 1970, followed by roughly
constant growth in the years hence.
The 2002 National Survey of Family Growth found that 50 percent of women
aged 15 to 44 had cohabited at some point and 9 percent were currently cohabiting.
In the United States, cohabitation has thus far largely been a stepping-stone toward
marriage, with most people who cohabit either ending their relationship or marrying within a few years. Among those currently cohabiting, the vast majority expect
their cohabitation to lead to marriage. Indeed, 34 percent enter cohabitation
having announced a plan to marry. Even among the remaining two-thirds who
enter cohabitation without being engaged, 36 percent were “almost certain” that
they would marry their current partner, and another 46 percent thought that there
was either “a pretty good chance” or “a 50–50 chance” that they would marry their
partner (according to the 2002 National Survey of Fertility Growth). Contrary to
stereotypes, men and women express similar expectations about their likelihood of
marrying their cohabiting partners. Such beliefs regarding their future likelihood
of marriage, however, are not always warranted. Among those couples who were
cohabiting in January 1997, slightly more than half were no longer together five
years later and only a quarter had married.
While most cohabitations do not end in marriage, most marriages are preceded by cohabitation. Among those entering first marriages in the early 2000s,
2 The 1990 Census cohabitation estimates need to be interpreted with some caution as the Census
“corrected” responses by same-sex couples, either recoding the gender of one partner, or their
relationship status. For more on this issue, see the paper by Black, Sanders, and Taylor in this volume.
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 37
59 percent had cohabited with their future spouse prior to marriage. Premarital
cohabitation with one’s future spouse is even more common among those who have
previously divorced, with 75 percent of those remarrying in the early 2000s preceding their wedding with a period of cohabitation. (Moreover, this differential is
robust to controlling for the higher age of most remarriages.) This trend to
premarital household formation may also explain some of the rise in measured age
at first marriage. Cohabiting couples represent a bit more than half of all first
marriages, and these couples typically entered into domesticity about two years
prior to marriage, thus high recent rates of premarital cohabitation may explain up
to a year of the rise in mean age at first marriage.
While it might seem that cohabiting before marriage should reduce uncertainty about the quality of a couple’s match, U.S. couples who cohabit before
marriage have been historically more likely to divorce than those who do not. This
pattern may reflect differential selection into cohabitation, as those who live
together prior to marriage may be doing so because they are less certain of the
quality of their match, or because they stand to gain less from marriage (Lillard,
Brien, and Waite, 1995; Brien, Lillard, and Stern, 2006). In other words, those who
choose to cohabit may have been more likely to divorce even if they had not lived
together first. Cohabitation may also be responsible for some of the reduction in
divorce rates witnessed over the past 25 years as separations that previously
occurred while legally married may now occur during premarital cohabitation. The
difficulty in making any of these attributions convincingly lies in constructing a
counterfactual: Would the cohabitating couple still have separated if they had
married earlier?
Cohabitation is clearly evolving, and some couples are currently entering
cohabitation as a permanent or semipermanent state. Among those cohabiting in
2002, a little over one-fifth had been doing so for five years or more, indicating that
some couples are treating cohabitation as a more permanent state. While for some
the decision to cohabit may reflect a lower commitment to one’s partnership, for
others this choice may reflect a lower value of the institutional structure of marriage
rather than a lower commitment. For instance, an increasing number of dualcareer couples combined with high marginal tax rates on secondary earners may
face a “marriage penalty,” while increasing social acceptance of cohabitation may
have diminished social stigma. Additionally, the incremental value of formal marriage in enforcing intertemporal commitments is smaller when divorce laws allow
one partner to dissolve the relationship unilaterally. Similarly, prenuptial contracts
have reduced the role of family law as an important default for allocating property
at divorce.
It remains an open question as to whether cohabitation might evolve from the
largely transitional role it currently plays in the United States to being a viable
alternative to marriage. Turning to international comparisons, as we do in the next
section, we see that cohabitation is poised to become an important family form in
several comparable nations.
38 Journal of Economic Perspectives
International Comparisons
Family life varies widely across industrialized nations. Table 2 shows that
Americans marry, divorce, and remarry at rates higher than in most other countries
with comparable income levels. This greater “churning” in marriage is reminiscent
of the cross-country labor market literature, in which the United States is known for
its greater labor market entry and exit.
Marriage appears to be more central and cherished in the United States than
in many other countries. Italy is similar to the United States in many respects—both
countries have low cohabitation rates and few believe that “marriage is an outdated
institution,” although the United States is an outlier in the low proportion agreeing
with that sentiment. Yet a major difference arises when examining divorce rates. In
Italy, divorce rates are extremely low and those who divorce in Italy remain
divorced (which accounts for why the proportion of the population “currently
divorced” remains at levels similar to the United States). While Americans reveal
their willingness to exit bad marriages in their high rates of divorce, only 43 percent
agree that “divorce is usually the best solution when a couple can’t seem to work out
their marriage options,” compared with an overwhelming majority in every other
country, including Italy.
Sweden provides a particularly stark counterpoint to the United States and
Italy, and is an interesting example of the “Nordic model” of the family. Swedish
marriage rates are low and cohabitation rates are high. Yet fertility—and particularly nonmarital fertility—remains quite high, consistent with an emerging social
norm in Sweden that childbirth and formal marriage need not be linked. Other
high-income countries may be moving toward the Nordic model, albeit slowly. For
instance, France, Canada, and the United Kingdom have cohabitation rates similar
to Sweden and high rates of out-of-wedlock childbirth.
Another point in which the United States seems exceptional is the relatively
young age at which women are giving birth. The age at which women have children
has been rising in all the countries, and in 2002, the average age at child birth was
over 30 in Italy and Sweden, and 29 or higher everywhere save the United States,
where the average age was 27.
Earlier, we documented the declining importance of children to married
life—at least for the United States, where today, only a minority of married
households include children. Table 2 suggests that this pattern may be even more
evident in other industrialized nations, where the trend toward out-of-wedlock
childbirth is also paired with a greater proportion of women marrying at older
(post-fertility) ages. For instance, in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, France, and Sweden, between a quarter and a third of marriages involved
women at least 35 years old. In Italy the proportion was only 15 percent, partially
reflecting the country’s very low rate of remarriage. Moreover, aggregate fertility—
whether married or not—is currently quite low in many European nations, a fact
that, beyond portending changes in the family, points to a looming “demographic
crisis” in many countries.
Marriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 39
The Driving Forces of Family Change
The economic approach to the family seeks to explain how and why families
form, and in so doing, this approach highlights the potential forces that change
family formation. Couples marry and stay married when the gains from marriage
exceed the gains from being single. These gains come from several sources:
production complementarities (such as household specialization and the raising of
Table 2
International Comparisons
(latest statistics, typically around 2003)
U.S. Canada UK France Germany Italy Sweden
Marriage
Annual marriages per thousand people 7.4 4.7 5.1 4.3 4.8 4.3 4.8
Annual marriages per thousand
unmarried adults 18.1 13.0 11.4 9.4 12.1 10.8 8.8
% of adult population currently
married 59.6% 62.9% 55.1% 54.3% 60.4% 60.0% 45.2%
% of adult population ever married 76.9% 75.5% 72.0% 69.5% 75.9% 72.8% 64.3%
Remarriage (% of marriages in which
the bride was previously married) 28.4% — 28.9% 17.6% 28.3% 6.3% 23.7%
% of 2002 marriages in which the
bride was 35 years old or over 31% 28% 30% 28% — 15% 33%
Divorce
Annual divorces per thousand people 3.6 2.2 2.8 2.1 2.6 0.8 2.2
Annual divorces per thousand married
people 8.5 4.6 6.9 5.1 5.7 1.3 6.8
% of adult population currently
divorced 10.2% 4.9% 8.3% 6.7% 6.3% 9.6% 11.3%
Cohabitation
% of adult population in nonmarital
cohabitation 4.7% 10.7% 11.6% 10.8% 7.1% 3.9% 11.7%
Fertility
Annual births per thousand people 14.0 10.4 11.7 12.7 8.6 9.5 11.1
Completed fertility: 1961 birth cohort 1.96 — 1.95 2.10 1.63 1.63 2.03
Mean age at childbirth 27.3 29.0 28.8 29.5 29.1 30.3 30.3
Non-marital births (% of all births) 34.6% 36.2% 42.3% 45.2% 28.0% 14.9% 55.4%
Attitudes: % Agree that ...
Marriage is an out-dated institution 10.1% 22.3% 25.9% 36.3% 18.4% 17.0% 20.4%
People who want children ought to get
married 65.3% 48.9% 52.4% 41.2% 52.9% 60.9% 31.0%
Divorce is usually the best solution
when a couple can’t seem to work
out their marriage problems 43.0% 78.0% 61.1% 61.0% 74.8% 65.0% 54.6%
Sources: Statistical Office of the European Communities (2005); U.S. Census Bureau (2007); Statistics
Canada (2004); International Social Survey Programme, 1994, 2002; World Values Survey, 2002;
Eurobarometer, 2002.
40 Journal of Economic Perspectives
one’s children); the benefits of risk pooling; and consumption complementarities
(such as the joint consumption of public goods and shared leisure activities). Thus,
reduced market discrimination against women and technological advances that
allow much of what was once produced by skilled-labor in the home to be purchased or produced with little skill reduce the benefits from specialization of
spouses in the home and market spheres, thereby decreasing the gains from
marriage. However, increasing leisure time and wealth, along with the changing
landscape defining sexual relations, potentially raise the gains from consumption
complementarities. These changes in tastes, technology, and the institutional or
legal environment have altered gains from marriage. With an eye to these drivers
of family formation and dissolution, we now review some of the fundamental
changes in the purpose, function, and form of family life over the past half century.
The Technology of Birth Control
The Economist (1999) cited the birth control pill as the invention that “defined
the 20th century.” In 1960, the first birth control pill was approved by the FDA and
diffused rapidly to married woman; by 1965, 41 percent of married women under
30 who used contraceptives were on “the pill” (Goldin and Katz, 2002). However,
laws limiting the distribution to unmarried women slowed broader diffusion of the
pill until the early 1970s, when such laws were finally overturned by the Supreme
Court in Eisenstadt v. Baird (405 U.S. 438 [1972]). This ruling quickly facilitated
distribution of the pill to unmarried women and by 1976, three-quarters of evercontracepting single 18 and 19 year olds had used the pill (Goldin and Katz, 2002).
The birth control pill was an important innovation in two respects: it was far
more effective than other forms of birth control; and unlike other forms of
contraception, the pill allowed contraceptive decisions to be made privately by a
woman, rather than jointly with her partner. In the early 1970s, women also gained
greater access to abortion through the legalization of abortion by five states in 1970
and nationwide through the Supreme Court’s decision in Roe v. Wade (410 U.S. 113
[1973]) three years later. Both the birth control pill and abortion decreased the
probability of an unwanted pregnancy. This improved control over fertility changed
the timing of marriage and births, and also facilitated the increase in women’s
accumulation of human capital by reducing the risk of disruption to women’s
education or labor market plans.
The pill also reduced the cost of waiting to marry, by allowing sex outside of
marriage with little fear of an unwanted pregnancy. The lower cost of delaying
marriage led to longer courtships, and courtship was also more informative (due to
greater sexual contact). Thus, those entering marriage did so with less uncertainty
about their compatibility, thereby reducing the number of bad matches. One effect
of this change was to lower the probability of divorce; another effect was to
encourage others to wait longer to marry, as fears receded that those left unmarried
by their mid-20s would confront an adversely-selected set of potential spouses.
Examining college-educated women, Goldin and Katz (2002) demonstrate that
differential access to the pill across states and cohorts robustly predicts subseBetsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 41
quently higher age at first marriage, lower divorce, and lower marriage rates. They
also demonstrate qualitatively similar, albeit smaller, effects from the legalization of
abortion.
While greater access to birth control and abortion did reduce unplanned
pregnancies, out-of-wedlock births increased following these technological innovations. Akerlof, Yellen, and Katz (1996) address this puzzle by arguing that women’s
newfound control over pregnancy increased pressure on them to engage in premarital sexual relations and reduced their ability to extract a commitment to marry
in the event of a pregnancy. Thus, those who did not adopt the pill, or who suffered
contraceptive failure, gained the option of choosing between abortion instead of
pregnancy, but if choosing pregnancy, typically lost the offer of a subsequent
“shotgun marriage.” Akerlof, Yellen, and Katz document a decline between the late
1960s and late 1980s in the percentage of parents marrying when faced with an
out-of-wedlock pregnancy and argue that—at least in an accounting sense—this
failure to marry subsequent to pregnancy explains much of the growth in out-ofwedlock births seen over this period.
While birth control has made sex safer in terms of an unwanted pregnancy, the
emergence of AIDS has made sex riskier. Specifically, AIDS changes the benefit of
sex within a monogamous relationship relative to that from casual sexual encounters, which may involve greater health risks, or costs of prevention through safe-sex
practices. Differences in infection and transmission rates across subgroups also
changes the costs of some pairings, and Francis (2006) provides intriguing evidence
that greater knowledge of the risk of AIDS reduces the probability of men choosing
same-sex partners, while increasing prevalence of same-sex partnerships among
women. Recent improvements in HIV treatments have substantially reduced AIDSrelated mortality and Lakdawalla, Sood, and Goldman (2006) provide evidence
that access to these treatments partly undoes some of the previous trends.
Household Technology
The spread of indoor plumbing and electricity in the first half of the twentieth
century along with the myriad of household appliances that diffused throughout
the last century (particularly in the 1950s and 1960s) led to vast increases in the
productivity of housework. Homemakers suddenly had freezers, washing machines,
dryers, steam irons, and a lucky few even had dishwashers at their disposal.
Greenwood, Seshadri, and Yorukoglu (2005) document this rise in household
appliances over the last century and cite evidence that the time required to clean
a load of laundry fell from four hours using manual methods to only 41 minutes
when aided by a 1940s-era electric washing machine and dryer. These breakthroughs in the invention of household appliances heralded a new age of freedom
for housewives, freeing them of the drudgery of household production and turning
them into “household managers” of an electric army.
Electricity and household appliances are “labor-saving” in that one can now
produce the same bundle of home-produced goods in less time. While substitution
effects may lead to some increased consumption of home-produced goods, income
42 Journal of Economic Perspectives
effects from these time-saving advances may also be important, increasing the
household’s consumption of both home- and market-produced goods. Greenwood,
Seshadri, and Yorukoglu (2005) suggest that the time-saving effects of these new
technologies dominated, leading women to spend less time working in the home
and more time in the market, thereby increasing female labor force participation.
Moreover, this technical change is unlikely to have been skill neutral. Even
basic tasks like laundry take much less skill with a modern washer and dryer.
(Anyone who has tried to do laundry on a scrub board or rock knows that it is quite
difficult!) In turn, this lower skill requirement has reduced the returns to specialization in home production. Indeed, this skill-substituting technical change parallels the decline in the field of home economics, the historically female-dominated
subject devoted to developing skills such as sewing and cooking.
Additionally, a growing service sector and increasing commoditization have
created ready market substitutes for products that were previously the exclusive
domain of home producers. Perhaps most significantly, technological improvements in the mass production of food led to the increased availability of factoryprepared food. Cutler, Glaeser, and Shapiro (2003) credit these innovations with
the 50 percent reduction in food preparation and clean-up times for both working
and nonworking women between 1965 and 1990.
These changes in household technology have implications for family formation. If the returns to specialization within a household fall, then the opportunity
cost of remaining single rather than marrying falls. Moreover, in a time when men
were specialized in market production, and household production required specialized labor inputs, it was not surprising that women with specialized market skills
had less to gain from marriage, and were therefore less likely to marry. It is only as
women have entered the labor market en masse that the education gap in marriage
rates among women has closed.
Consider a further implication of these changes. Greenwood and Vandenbroucke (2005) credit technological progress with reducing the workweek from
70 hours in 1830 to 41 hours in 2002, and Aguiar and Hurst (forthcoming)
document a rise in leisure over the past 40 years that corresponds to roughly an
additional 5–10 weeks of vacation per year. As the mix of household activities has
shifted, optimal matching in the marriage market has likely changed. Thus, one
might expect these changes to have made leisure and consumption complementarities more important drivers of matching than the production complementarities emphasized by Becker (1981). For instance, while Becker had predicted that
those with high wage rates will tend to marry those with lower wage rates (“negative
assortative mating”) because the benefits from the division of labor within a
household can make the earning abilities of the man and the woman substitutes for
one another, this argument loses force in two-career couples. As marriage comes to
be built more around consumption complementarities we might expect it to increasingly involve the pairing of those with similar income and interests (Lam, 1998).
An alternative complementarity arises from thinking about households as
insurance units. While the increase in female labor force participation has reduced
Marriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 43
specialization in the home, it may have increased the benefit from household risk
sharing. As such, we may see a different form of negative assortative matching, as
people seek spouses whose labor income risk is negatively correlated (or at least
uncorrelated) with their own.
Changes in Wage Structures
A large literature in labor economics (surveyed in the Spring 1997 issue of this
journal) has documented increasing wage inequality since the 1970s. These
changes reflect several factors including skill-biased technical change, a declining
real value of the minimum wage, and the de-unionization of the American workforce. Gould and Paserman (2003) argue that this change directly impacts marriage
markets, raising the importance of “searching for Mr. Right.” That is, rising wage
inequality has increased the returns to further search and thus increased the option
value of remaining unmarried. Gould and Paserman test this effect of inequality on
marriages rates by examining the consequences of differences across cities in the
rates at which inequality grew through the 1970s and 1980s. They find that in cities
in which wage inequality rose fastest, the proportion of young women who were
married fell quite dramatically. Indeed, their estimates suggest that this rising wage
inequality may account for up to one-third of the decline in the marriage rate of
21–30 year old women.
Another important change in the wage structure is the decline in the gender
wage gap. Blau and Kahn (2000) describe these changes as emanating from a
decline in explicitly sexist personnel policies (partly driven by the increasing reach
of antidiscrimination law); increased labor market experience among women (and
increased returns to this experience); declining occupational segregation; and
de-unionization. In the face of these trends, the comparative advantage of wives in
home rather than market production has declined, driving an increasing share of
men into home production or reducing the value of specialization within marriage.
Beyond possibly reducing the attractiveness of marriage, the reduction in the
gender wage gap may have other, subtle effects. For instance, Becker, Landes, and
Michael (1977) explain the historically younger age at which women married by
noting that the specialized investments made by women in home economics were
much less useful to singles. Indeed, as women have come to invest more in market
skills, so too the age at which they choose to marry has drawn closer to parity with
men. Caucutt, Guner, and Knowles (2002) argue that rising returns to labor market
experience may also have important dynamic effects, raising the incentive for
highly educated women to delay the timing of fertility in favor of developing
stronger prospects in both labor and marriage markets.
The difficulty in empirically assessing the effects of changes in labor markets
on family outcomes is that a strong reverse channel likely confounds any easy
inference. For instance, women who forecast later or more fragile marriages may
choose to invest more in their careers, leading to better labor force outcomes for
women. As one example of such a dynamic, Johnson and Skinner (1986) find that
women who anticipate a future divorce are more likely to participate in the labor
44 Journal of Economic Perspectives
market. Similarly, Stevenson (2006) finds that unilateral divorce laws led to an
increase in labor force participation for both married and unmarried women.
Changes in the Legal Structure of Marriage
Governments set the parameters that define the family as a legal institution.
These parameters define who is to be granted marriages, divorces, and parental
rights, and articulate subsequent obligations. The law also provides a set of default
property rights in case of separation or death, and a definition of the family for the
purposes of taxation and government programs.
In the United States, the 1960s ushered in a wave of large-scale deregulation of
the family. Consequently, the role that the government plays in deciding both who
can marry and divorce has steadily diminished. In the 1950s some state legislatures
began to repeal laws restricting marriage between racial groups. These antimiscegenation laws were eliminated nationwide in 1967 by the Supreme Court ruling in
Loving v. Virginia (388 U.S. 1), which argued that marriage was “one of the ‘basic
civil rights of man’” (in this issue, Fryer discusses patterns of interracial marriage
over time). This ruling set the stage for further deregulation of marriage, and states
could no longer bar those deemed “unsuitable,” such as felons, deadbeat dads,
those with a low IQ, and the insane, from marrying.3
Supreme Court rulings in the 1960s and 1970s also changed the nature of
family relationships by eliminating many of the legal distinctions stemming from
the marital status of a child’s parents. In 1968, the Supreme Court ruling in Levy v.
Louisiana (391 U.S. 68) granted equal protection under the Fourteenth Amendment to “illegitimate” children. Five years later, the 1973 ruling in Gomez v. Perez
(409 U.S. 535) overturned state laws exempting men from financial responsibility
for “illegitimate” children. These rulings reduced both the social and economic
cost to women of bearing a child out-of-wedlock, and thus may also help to explain
the decline in shotgun marriages. This remains an under-researched topic in need
of further scrutiny.
During this period, states also began to consider reducing their role in
divorce proceedings. In the 1950s, most states required evidence of marital fault
before allowing a marriage to be dissolved. Beginning in the late 1960s, many
states introduced “irreconcilable differences” as grounds for divorce; effectively
ushering in a period of unilateral divorce—divorce upon the request of either
spouse, regardless of the wishes of his or her partner. In addition to the passage
of unilateral divorce laws during this period, many states removed fault as a
consideration in property division and some states changed laws governing
property division subsequent to divorce. Currently, all but five states have some
form of unilateral divorce and two-thirds allow unrestricted unilateral divorce.
3 In 1978 the U.S. Supreme Court in Zablocki v. Redhail (434 U.S. 374) invoked the Loving decision when
holding that a Wisconsin law requiring noncustodial parents to seek a court order (to prove they were
not behind in child support payments) prior to receiving a marriage license was unconstitutional.
Similarly, in 1987 Loving was cited in a decision that overturned a regulation that prohibited inmates
from marrying without the permission of the warden (Turner v. Safley, 482 U.S. 78).
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 45
These legal changes fundamentally alter the basis of the marriage contract.
They remove the ability to make intertemporal contracts within marriage—one
spouse cannot promise not to leave his or her spouse in the future. They shift
the right to divorce (and hence bargaining power) from the party most interested in preserving the marriage to the person who most wants out of the
marriage. While the old laws had allowed divorce only with sufficient evidence
of fault, many divorces involved couples where there was mutual consent to
divorce. These couples used private bargaining to determine uncontested (and often
manufactured) claims of fault to present to the courts. Thus, the fault-based system
essentially allowed mutual consent divorce, but not unilateral divorce.
Becker, Landes, and Michael (1977) argued that the divorce rate would be
unaffected by a shift from consent to unilateral divorce laws. They argued that
this shift simply represents the reallocation of an existing property right from
one spouse to the other—namely the right of oneself or one’s spouse to remarry.
Invoking the Coase theorem, they suggested that “the allocation of property rights or
legal liability does not influence resource allocation when the parties involved can
bargain with each other at little cost.” Yet the assumptions required for Coasian
bargaining, including symmetric information, transferable utility, and the absence
of important transaction costs, may be unrealistic for the marginal divorce.
Many empirical papers have investigated whether unilateral divorce has led to
a rise in the divorce rate with several reaching conflicting findings (Peters, 1986,
1992; Allen, 1992; Friedberg, 1998). Most recently, Wolfers (2006) tests these
competing views by analyzing divorce rates and divorce laws across U.S. states from
1956–1998. He finds that divorce rates rose sharply in the two years following the
adoption of unilateral divorce laws, as the courts catered to pent-up demand for
divorce. Subsequently the divorce rate reverted back toward earlier levels, and a
decade after these reforms no discernable effect on the divorce rate remains.
Despite apparent conflict in this literature, it is worth emphasizing the point of
substantial agreement: each of these authors finds that liberalized divorce laws had
at most a small effect on divorce rates, and these reforms explain very little of the
rise in divorce over the past half century.
While Coasian bargaining predicts little change in divorce rates, it does
predict changes in intrahousehold distribution, as these changes affect each
spouse’s options outside marriage, and hence their bargaining position. In
Stevenson and Wolfers (2006), we find that female suicide and domestic violence fell in states that adopted unilateral divorce laws. They interpret these
findings as suggesting that unilateral divorce laws shift bargaining power to
women. These laws may also affect both the likelihood of marriage and intertemporal decision making within marriage. Rasul (2006) finds that the reduced
gains from marriage under unilateral divorce led to a decrease in marriage rates.
Research by Stevenson (2007) focuses on the difficulty in intertemporally contracting
when marriages can be unilaterally dissolved. Analyzing a sample of newlyweds (so as
to minimize selection due to changes in divorce), she finds that the adoption of
unilateral divorce laws led to a decrease or delay in several forms of investment whose
46 Journal of Economic Perspectives
returns are at least partly marriage-specific, including having children, household
specialization, and the financial support of a spouse’s education.
Shocks to the Marriage Market Matching Function
A key insight of “search” models of the labor market is that the ease with which
workers can locate relevant job openings determines equilibrium employment,
unemployment duration, and bargained wages. So too, in the marriage market, the
ease with which potential partners can meet and decide whether to date affects if,
when, and to whom marriage occurs. Moreover, changes in the marriage market
“matching function” have effects beyond the dating phase, as an important factor
shaping behavior within marriage is the threat that a spouse may file for divorce—a
threat whose impact is shaped by an assessment of one’s likely chances on the
remarriage market.
McKinnish (forthcoming) provides intriguing evidence of a shock to matching: increasingly sexually-integrated workplaces now create greater opportunities
for men and women to meet. Analyzing data from the 1990 census, she shows that
working in an industry or occupation comprised of a greater share of members of
the opposite sex is more likely to lead a marriage to end in divorce, a phenomenon
she labels “another form of on-the-job search.” While she does not analyze consequences for marriage, these effects could plausibly go in either direction: the
increased likelihood (and speed) with which one meets an acceptable spouse could
increase marriage, while greater current and future exposure to potential mates
raises the option value of remaining single. A related shock to future marital
patterns—and surely a useful focus for future research—comes from sharply
changing gender ratios on college campuses: Goldin, Katz, and Kuziemko (2006)
report in this journal that while women were a distinct minority of undergraduates
in 1960, they now make up a clear majority.
The potential of the Internet to increase the efficiency of matching provides
another important shock. Indeed, it inspired a bold claim in Wired (Griscom, 2002):
“Twenty years from now, the idea that someone looking for love won’t look for it
online will be silly, akin to skipping the card catalog to instead wander the stacks
because ‘the right books are found only by accident’. . . serendipity is the hallmark
of inefficient markets, and the marketplace of love, like it or not, is becoming more
efficient.” Data from Forrester Research suggests that in 2004, 16 percent of singles
are using online personals, and a September 2005 Internet Tracking Poll suggests
that 3 percent of Internet users who are currently coupled first met online.4 Online
search differs from offline search in two important ways: it expands the set of
potential partners and it affords a degree of anonymity. Each of these characteristics shapes the contours of online dating. For instance, Forrester data suggest that
over one-third of those using online personals are currently married.
4 Forrester data are author’s calculations using Forrester’s 2004 Technographics Benchmark Survey
(sample size: 55,000). The Internet Tracking Poll was done by the Pew Internet & American Life Project
and Princeton Survey Research Associates International, September 14–December 8, 2005.
Marriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 47
The Internet’s potential to change matching is perhaps greatest for those
facing thin markets or difficulty in meeting potential mates. Indeed, the Forrester
data reveals that those who perceive themselves as facing such markets are more likely
to use online personals: blacks and Asians are three times as likely as whites, those with
physical disabilities are twice as likely as those without, and gays are four times as likely
as straights. Not surprisingly then, several large dating sites exist to serve these niche
matching markets, including various ethnic groups, gays, lesbians, the elderly,
farmers, persons living with specific disabilities, and those who are HIV-positive.
The larger mainstream dating sites also allow for narrowly tailored searches,
reversing the typical temporal pattern of courtship from assessing attraction before
suitability, to one in which couples can ensure that they are appropriately matched
on information about religion, fertility, and marriage aspirations, income, or other
important factors, before ever meeting. While this may hark back to the days of
parents selecting suitable mates for their children, these matches may be importantly different in the characteristics desired for matching than those selected by
parents or other matchmakers. The targeted search offered by the Internet might
lead one to forecast greater endogamy (within-group matching). Hitsch, Hortac¸su,
and Ariely (2006) examine the characteristics of couples whose dates were arranged
through an online dating service, and find, however, that the correlations of
characteristics such as age, height, weight, beauty, income, and education were
qualitatively similar to those observed among married couples. Yet even within
these groups, Internet search allows for the selection of mates with similar consumption and leisure preferences (for example, “must love dogs”).
While the Internet may yet transform marriage markets, it is too early to assess
whether those matched on the Internet are better matched than they would have
been without the Internet, whether marriage rates will subsequently rise, and what
impact this will have on divorce. The tremendous amount of search being done
online by those already married is potentially a harbinger of rising divorce rates, yet
this affect may be ameliorated by improved match quality in new marriages.
Finally, search and matching can have an important role in amplifying shocks
to the marriage market. For instance, Chiappori and Weiss (2000) note that if the
divorce rate rises, then—assuming undirected search—one might meet more
divorcees in the course of a day. Thus, were one to divorce, the probability of
remarrying is higher, making divorce a more attractive option; this thick market
externality creates a self-reinforcing rise in divorce.
Interpreting the Evidence
Our analysis of the family has pointed to trends in family life and possible driving
forces, but we have provided little interpretation of the welfare implications of these
trends. Without some discussion of welfare, drawing conclusions about desirable family
policies is impossible. We hope to stimulate further research on these issues.
A common argument for a policy response to recent trends notes that, on
48 Journal of Economic Perspectives
average, divorced people are worse off—and married people better off—financially, physically, and emotionally. These associations often lead to the recommendation that policymakers should focus on reducing the rate of marital dissolution
or on promoting marriage (for instance, Waite and Gallagher, 2000). Yet, there is
little hard evidence that these policies would be welfare-enhancing. Instead, these
policy prescriptions are founded on an assumption that divorce causes people to be
worse off, rather than that people who are worse off face a greater risk of divorce.
Furthermore, it is important to differentiate between the average marriage—which
is likely a happy one—and the marginal marriage that may be created or spared by
government policy, which may be quite different.
Indeed, the economic theory of the family points precisely in this direction.
Becker, Landes, and Michael (1977, p. 1144) argue that “the majority of
divorces results from uncertainty and unfavorable outcomes.” Thus, we would
expect to see those who suffer unexpected unfavorable outcomes to be more
likely to both divorce and remain unmarried following a divorce, thereby
contributing disproportionately to the stock of the currently divorced. Empirical research has found evidence for such a pattern: Charles and Stephens
(2004) find that the divorce hazard rises following a spouse’s layoff and they
suggest that this increased probability of divorce stems from the information
conveyed about the person’s suitability as a spouse, rather than stemming directly
from financial losses.
The theory of the family also suggests that marriage is most likely to occur
when the potential gains from marriage are large. Individuals with high earning
potential have more to gain from domestic arrangements that allow them to
specialize in market production; those with a “love of fun” have more to gain from
shared leisure and consumption; and those with good health have more to gain due
to the greater potential longevity of their marriage. Thus, we should expect that the
wealthy, happy, and healthy are more likely to marry. Indeed, even as surveys show
that married people are happier than those who are not married, our analysis of
self-reported happiness and marital histories in the British Household Panel Survey
reveals that singles who are the happiest are also the most likely to marry in the
future. If we follow those who were single in 1996 through time, we find that those
who married by 2004 experienced gains in happiness similar to gains experienced
by those who didn’t marry. Similarly, Gardner and Oswald (2006) find that while
people are less happy the year that they separate, a year after the divorce they are
happier than they were while married.
Ultimately, purely observational studies cannot convincingly establish whether
people are better or worse off as a result of marriage or divorce. The problem is that
a number of factors linking well-being and marital status are unobservable to the
researcher. One response is to seek natural experiments that may lead to a sort of
random variation across marital status. A small number of promising studies have
taken this tack and found quite surprising results. For instance, an earlier literature
had shown that the economic status of divorced women was lower than that for
married women, a fact that had led to concern that divorce impoverishes women
Betsey Stevenson and Justin Wolfers 49
(though it may be just as plausible that low income drives divorce). Bedard and
Descheˆnes (2005) exploit the fact that divorce is more likely to follow if the first
child born is a girl than a boy to assess the effects of those “random” divorces caused
by child gender. They find that divorced women have higher household income and
annual earnings than never-divorced women, a fact that is attributable to divorced
women working more intensively and the potential for divorced women to join
higher-income households (such as their parents’). In another study, Dahl (2005)
uses variation in state laws restricting the minimum age of marriage to show that
those who are prevented from marrying while young are substantially less likely to
end up living in poverty later in their lives.
Even while these studies seek to separate correlation from causation, they do
not provide directly welfare-relevant metrics. For instance, even if we isolate factors
that create more or less divorce, these insights would only yield policy recommendations if coupled with an understanding of whether we currently have an efficient
number of divorces, too many, or too few. To understand this point, consider an
analogy to the labor market. The U.S. labor market, like its marriage markets,
differs from Europe in having substantially greater “churn”; in any given month in
the United States, workers are more likely to be fired than are their European
counterparts and those without a match are more likely to be hired. There is an
emerging consensus that restrictions on churning in European labor markets yield
inefficient labor markets with “too few” job separations. We do not mean to suggest
by analogy that Europe is afflicted with too few divorces. Rather we highlight this
parallel because it makes the point that a combination of empirical work, attention
to causal inference, and general equilibrium theorizing are required to assess
implications for aggregate well-being changes in marriage markets. With the economics of the family now celebrating the 25th birthday of its foundational text
(Becker, 1981), we are confident that the next 25 years will provide progress toward
this goal.
y The authors would like to thank Leora Friedberg, Christopher Jencks, William Johnson,
Lawrence Katz, John Knowles, Robert Pollak, Timothy Taylor, and participants in Wharton’s
applied economics seminar for useful comments. Adam Isen, Sam Proctor, Rachel Schwartz,
and Hao Wang provided excellent research assistance.
References
Aguiar, Mark, and Erik Hurst. Forthcoming. “Measuring Trends in Leisure: The Allocation of Time
over Five Decades.” Quarterly Journal of Economics.
Akerlof, George, Janet Yellen, and Michael,
Katz. 1996. “An Analysis of Out-of-Wedlock
Childbearing in the United States.” Quarterly
Journal of Economics, 111(2): 277–317.
Allen, Douglas W. 1992. “Marriage and Di50 Journal of Economic Perspectives
vorce: Comment.” American Economic Review,
82(3): 679–85.
Becker, Gary S. 1981. A Treatise on the Family.
Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
Becker, Gary S., Elizabeth M. Landes, and
Robert T. Michael. 1977. “An Economic Analysis
of Marital Instability.” Journal of Political Economy,
85(6): 1141–87.
Bedard, Kelly, and Olivier Descheˆnes. 2005.
“Sex Preferences, Marital Dissolution, and the
Economic Status of Women.” Journal of Human
Resources, 40(2): 411–34.
Blau, Francine D., and Lawrence M. Kahn.
2000. “Gender Differences in Pay.” Journal of
Economic Perspectives, 14(4): 75–99.
Brien, Michael J., Lee A. Lillard, and Steven
Stern. 2006. “Cohabitation, Marriage, and Divorce in a Model of Match Quality.” International
Economic Review, 47(2): 451–94.
Carter, Susan B. et al., eds. 2006. Historical
Statistics of the United States, Earliest Times to the
Present. Millennial Edition. New York: Cambridge University Press.
Caucutt, Elizabeth, Nezih Guner, and John
Knowles. 2002. “Why Do Women Wait? Matching, Wage, Inequality, and the Incentives for
Fertility Delay.” Review of Economic Dynamics,
5(4): 815–55.
Charles, Kerwin, and Melvin Stephens. 2004.
“Disability, Job Displacement, and Divorce.” Journal of Labor Economics, 22(2): 489–523.
Cherlin, Andrew. 1981. Marriage, Divorce,
Remarriage. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University
Press.
Chiappori, P. A., and Y. Weiss. (2000).
“Marriage Contracts and Divorce: An Equilibirum Analysis.” http://home.uchicago.edu/
pchiappo/wp/divrevsh.pdf.
Coontz, Stephanie. 2005. Marriage, a History:
From Obedience to Intimacy, or How Love Conquered
Marriage. New York: Viking.
Cutler, David, Edward Glaeser, and Jesse
Shapiro. 2003. “Why Have Americans Become
More Obese.” Journal of Economic Perspectives,
17(3): 93–118.
Dahl, Gordon. 2005. “Myopic Matrimony and
Dropout Decisions? Evidence Using State Laws
for Marriage, Schooling, and Work.” National
Bureau of Economic Research Working Paper
11328.
The Economist. 1999. “Millennium Issue: Oral
Contraceptives: The Liberator.” Dec. 23.
Ellwood, David T., and Jonathan Crane. 1990.
“Family Change Among Black Americans: What
Do We Know?” Journal of Economic Perspectives,
4(4): 65–84
Fitch, Catherin, Ron Goeken, and Steven
Ruggles. 2005. “The Rise of Cohabitation in the
United States: New Historical Estimates.” http://
www.hist.umn.edu/ruggles/cohab-revised2.pdf.
Francis, Andrew M. 2006. “The Economics of
Sexuality: The Effect of HIV/AIDS on Homosexual Behavior, Desire, and Identity in the
United States.” http://userwww.service.emory.
edu/afranc5/Economics_of_Sexuality.pdf.
Friedberg, Leora. 1998. “Did Unilateral Divorce Raise Divorce Rates? Evidence from Panel
Data.” American Economic Review, 83(3): 608–27.
Gardner, Jonathan, and Andrew Oswald.
2006. “Do Divorcing Couples Become Happier
By Breaking Up?” Journal of the Royal Statistical
Societ: Series A (Statistics in Society), 169(2): 319–
36.
Goldin, Claudia, and Lawrence Katz. 2002.
“The Power of the Pill: Oral Contraceptives and
Women’s Career and Marriage Decisions.” Journal of Political Economy, 110(4): 730–70.
Goldin, Claudia, Lawrence Katz, and Ilyana
Kuziemko. 2006. Journal of Economic Perspectives,
20(4): 133–56.
Gould, Eric, and Daniele Paserman. 2003.
“Waiting for Mr. Right: Rising Inequality and
Declining Marriage Rates.” Journal of Urban Economics, 53(2): 257–81.
Greenwood, Jeremy, Ananth Seshadri, and
Mehmet Yorukoglu. 2005. “Engines of Liberation.” Review of Economic Studies, 72(1): 109–33.
Greenwood, Jeremy, and Guillaume Vandenbroucke. 2005. “Hours Worked: Long-Run
Trends.” National Bureau of Economic Research
Working Paper 11629.
Griscom, Rufus. 2002. “Why Are Online Personals So Hot?” Wired, Issue 10.11. (November.)
http://www.wired.com/wired/archive/10.11/
view.html?pg2.
Hitsch, Guenter, Ali Hortac¸su, and Dan Ariely. 2006. “What Makes You Click? Mate Preferences and Matching Outcomes in Online Dating.”
http://home.uchicago.edu/ghitsch/HitschResearch/Guenter%20Hitsch_files/OnlineDating.pdf.
Jacobson, Paul H. 1959. American Marriage and
Divorce, Rinehart and Company, Inc.: New York.
Johnson, William H., and Jonathan Skinner.
1986. “Labor Supply and Marital Separation.”
American Economic Review, 76(3): 455–69.
Lakdawalla, Darius, Neeraj Sood, and Dana
Goldman. 2006. “HIV Breakthroughs and Risky
Sexual Behavior.” Quarterly Journal of Economics,
121(3): 1063–1102.
Lam, David. 1988. “Marriage Markets and Assortative Mating with Household Public Goods:
Theoretical Results and Empirical Implications.”
Journal of Human Resources, 23(4): 462–87.
Marriage and Divorce and their Driving Forces 51
Lillard, Lee A., Michael J. Brien, and Linda J.
Waite. 1995. “Pre-Marital Cohabitation and Subsequent Marital Dissolution: A Matter of SelfSelection?” Demography, 32(3): 437–58.
McKinnish, Terra. Forthcoming. “Sexually-Integrated Workplaces and Divorce: Another
Form of On-the-Job Search.” Journal of Human
Resources.
Peters, H. Elizabeth. 1986. “Marriage and Divorce: Informational Constraints and Private
Contracting.” American Economic Review, 76(3):
437–54.
Peters, H. Elizabeth. 1992. “Marriage and Divorce: Reply.” American Economic Review, 82(3).
Rasul, Imran. 2006. “The Impact of Divorce
Laws on Marriage.” Unpublished paper, University College, London.
Statistical Office of the European Communities. 2005. Eurostat Yearbook: The Statistical Guide
to Europe. Luxembourg: Office for Official Publications of the European Union.
Statistics Canada. 2004. The Canada Year Book.
Online edition available at: www.statcan.ca.
Stevenson, Betsey. 2006. “Divorce-Law Changes,
Household Bargaining, and Married Women’s
Labor Supply Revisited.” Unpublished paper,
University of Pennsylvania.
Stevenson, Betsey. 2007. “The Impact of Divorce Laws on Investment in Marriage-Specific
Capital.” Journal of Labor Economics, 25(1): 75–94.
Stevenson, Betsey, and Justin Wolfers. 2006.
“Bargaining in the Shadow of the Law: Divorce
Laws and Family Distress.”Quarterly Journal of
Economics, 121(1): 267–88.
U.S. Census Bureau. 2005. Current Population
Survey, March and Annual Social and Economic
Supplements, 2005 and Earlier. http://www.census.
gov/population/socdemo/hh-fam/ms2.pdf.
U.S. Census Bureau. 2007. Statistical Abstract of
the United States. Washington, DC.
Waite, Linda J., and Maggie Gallagher. 2000.
The Case for Marriage. New York: Random House.
Wolfers, Justin. 2006. “Did Unilateral Divorce
Raise Divorce Rates? A Reconciliation and New
Results.” American Economic Review, 96(5): 1805–
1820.
52 Journal of Economic Perspectives
This article has been cited by:
1. Ya-Hui Huang, Yan Ma. 2024. Climate change and divorce behavior: Implication for family education.
Innovation and Green Development 3:1, 100115. [Crossref]
2. Andrew E. Clark, Conchita D’Ambrosio, Anthony Lepinteur. 2023. Marriage as insurance: job
protection and job insecurity in France. Review of Economics of the Household 21:4, 1157-1190.
[Crossref]
3. Elizabeth Hatch, Chuyuan Wang, Wei Kang, Brajesh Karna, Natalie Sabinsky, Kristin M. Ferguson.
2023. Geographies of Opportunity for Youth Across the Contiguous United States. The Professional
Geographer 16, 1-24. [Crossref]
4. Fabio Blasutto. 2023. Cohabitation vs. Marriage: Mating Strategies by Education in The USA. Journal
of the European Economic Association 15. . [Crossref]
5. William A. Darity, Raffi E. García, Lauren Russell, Jorge N. Zumaeta. 2023. Racial Disparities in
Family Income, Assets, and Liabilities: A Century After the 1921 Tulsa Massacre. Journal of Family
and Economic Issues 40. . [Crossref]
6. Saira Khan, Lindsay Fuzzell, Marvin Langston, Yunan Han, Justin X. Moore, Keon Gilbert, Siobhan
Sutcliffe, Jeannette T. Bensen, James L. Mohler, Elizabeth T.H. Fontham, Lixin Song, Marquita W.
Lewis-Thames. 2023. The impact of marital status on tumor aggressiveness, treatment, and screening
among black and white men diagnosed with prostate cancer. Cancer Causes & Control 66. . [Crossref]
7.Dong Zhou, Yi Xu, Qixuan He. 2023. New Media Use and Mental Health of Married Women:
Mediating Effects of Marital Quality. Healthcare 11:21, 2909. [Crossref]
8. Minsu Chang. 2023. Changing Marital Transitions and Homeownership Among Young Households.
Review of Economic Dynamics . [Crossref]
9. Kimberly McErlean. 2023. Cohabiting couple's economic organization and marriage patterns across
social classes. Journal of Marriage and Family 38. . [Crossref]
10. Riccardo Ciacci, María José Martín Rodrigo, Antonio Núñez Partido. 2023. Unilateral divorce laws
affect women’s welfare. PLOS ONE 18:10, e0289154. [Crossref]
11. Iryna Hayduk, Kristin J. Kleinjans. 2023. The Long-Term Effects of Unilateral Divorce Laws on
the Noncognitive Skill of Conscientiousness. The B.E. Journal of Economic Analysis & Policy 23:4,
1137-1154. [Crossref]
12. Clara E. Piano, Rachael Behr, Kacey Reeves West. 2023. The supply and demand of marital contracts:
the case of same-sex marriage. Public Choice 51. . [Crossref]
13. Benjamin Samuel Ambiel, Ingmar Rapp, Jonathan Simon Gruhler. 2023. Evening Work and Its
Relationship with Couple Time. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 23. . [Crossref]
14. Riccardo Ciacci. 2023. On the economic determinants of prostitution: marriage compensation and
unilateral divorce in U.S. states. Review of Economics of the Household 21:3, 941-1017. [Crossref]
15. Lauren Hoehn-Velasco, Jose Roberto Balmori de la Miyar, Adan Silverio-Murillo, Sherajum Monira
Farin. 2023. Marriage and divorce during a pandemic: the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on
marital formation and dissolution in Mexico. Review of Economics of the Household 21:3, 757-788.
[Crossref]
16. Linda M. Blum, Kaitlyn Eri Lee, Olivia Binder, Emma Clifford. 2023. Dating at a Distance: Does It
Take a Pandemic to Challenge Campus Sexual Culture? 1. Sociological Forum 38:3, 616-636. [Crossref]
17. Marco Francesconi, Robert A. Pollak, Domenico Tabasso. 2023. Unequal bequests. European
Economic Review 157, 104513. [Crossref]
18. Kiruthika Anandharaman, Geetha Rangasamy. 2023. Investigating the Impact of the Spouse and
Family in the Female Entrepreneur’s Life: A Conceptual Framework. Journal of Law and Sustainable
Development 11:2, e704. [Crossref]
19. Christina Gathmann, Julio Garbers. 2023. Citizenship and integration. Labour Economics 82, 102343.
[Crossref]
20. Arkadev Ghosh, Sam Il Myoung Hwang, Munir Squires. 2023. Economic Consequences of Kinship:
Evidence From U.S. Bans on Cousin Marriage. The Quarterly Journal of Economics 166. . [Crossref]
21. Juan-José Díaz, Victor Saldarriaga. 2023. A drop of love? Rainfall shocks and spousal abuse: Evidence
from rural Peru. Journal of Health Economics 89, 102739. [Crossref]
22.David Boto‐García, Federico Perali. 2023. The association between marital locus of control and break‐
up intentions. The American Journal of Economics and Sociology 34. . [Crossref]
23. Jorge Herrera de la Cruz, José‐Manuel Rey. 2023. A computational stochastic dynamic model to
assess the risk of breakup in a romantic relationship. Mathematical Methods in the Applied Sciences
11. . [Crossref]
24. Chunkai Zhao, Boou Chen, Xing Li. 2023. Rising housing prices and marriage delays in China:
Evidence from the urban land transaction policy. Cities 135, 104214. [Crossref]
25.Doug B. Downey, Man Yao, Joseph Merry. 2023. The Inverse Association Between Number
of Siblings and Divorce: New Evidence From China and Europe. Journal of Family Issues 20,
0192513X2311629. [Crossref]
26. Jorge Garcia-Hombrados, Berkay Özcan. 2023. Age at marriage and marital stability: evidence from
China. Review of Economics of the Household 72. . [Crossref]
27. Benedict Barnes, Ishmael Takyi, Joseph Ackora-Prah, George Hughes, Emmanuel Saarah Baidoo.
2023. The mathematical model for marital interactions in Ghana. Scientific African 19, e01449.
[Crossref]
28. Vesarach Aumeboonsuke, Anetta Caplanova. 2023. An analysis of impact of personality traits and
mindfulness on risk aversion of individual investors. Current Psychology 42:8, 6800-6817. [Crossref]
29. Shubhankar Sharma, Jo Mhairi Hale, Mikko Myrskylä, Hill Kulu. 2023. Cognitive impairment and
partnership status in the United States, 1998–2016, by sex, race/ethnicity, and education. Population
Studies 60, 1-11. [Crossref]
30. Hani Mansour, Terra McKinnish. 2023. Male wage inequality and characteristics of “early mover”
marriages. Journal of Population Economics 36:1, 115-138. [Crossref]
31. Marika Jalovaara, Linus Andersson. 2023. A register-based account of period trends in union
prevalence, entries, and exits by educational level for men and women in Finland. Demographic Research
48, 373-386. [Crossref]
32. Livia Sz. Oláh, Rudolf Richter, Irena Kotowska. 2023. Introduction to the Special Collection on The
new roles of women and men and implications for families and societies. Demographic Research 48,
849-866. [Crossref]
33. Stefania Albanesi, Claudia Olivetti, Barbara Petrongolo. Families, labor markets, and policy 255-326.
[Crossref]
34. Ugo Bolletta, Luca Paolo Merlino. 2022. Marriage Through Friends. Dynamic Games and Applications
12:4, 1046-1066. [Crossref]
35. Christopher J. Ruhm. 2022. Living and Dying in America: An Essay on Deaths of Despair and the
Future of Capitalism. Journal of Economic Literature 60:4, 1159-1187. [Abstract] [View PDF article]
[PDF with links]
36. Osea Giuntella, Lorenzo Rotunno, Luca Stella. 2022. Globalization, Fertility, and Marital Behavior
in a Lowest-Low Fertility Setting. Demography 59:6, 2135-2159. [Crossref]
37. Julen Esteban‐Pretel, Junichi Fujimoto. 2022. How do marital formation and dissolution differ across
employment statuses? Analysis of J apanese non‐regular employees. Pacific Economic Review 27:5,
425-461. [Crossref]
38. Robert C. Brooks, Khandis R. Blake, Lutz Fromhage. 2022. Effects of gender inequality and wealth
inequality on within-sex mating competition under hypergyny. Evolution and Human Behavior 43:6,
501-509. [Crossref]
39. Peter Siminski, Rhiannon Yetsenga. 2022. Specialization, Comparative Advantage, and the Sexual
Division of Labor. Journal of Labor Economics 40:4, 851-887. [Crossref]
40. Rania Gihleb, Osnat Lifshitz. 2022. Dynamic effects of educational assortative mating on labor supply.
Review of Economic Dynamics 46, 302-327. [Crossref]
41. Jamie Blalock, Suzanne Bartle‐Haring. 2022. Transition into marriage: A test of relational uncertainty,
turbulence, dyadic synchrony, and cohabitation in newlyweds. Family Relations 71:4, 1637-1657.
[Crossref]
42. Ganghua Mei, Lei Yue. 2022. Labor supply and time use: evidence from cohabiting women in the
United States. Applied Economics 54:44, 5133-5158. [Crossref]
43. Songtao Yang. 2022. The effects of compulsory schooling reforms on women’s marriage outcomes—
evidence from Britain. Empirical Economics 63:3, 1637-1662. [Crossref]
44. Mizuki Komura, Hikaru Ogawa. 2022. COVID-19, marriage, and divorce in Japan. Review of Economics
of the Household 20:3, 831-853. [Crossref]
45. Moa Frödin Gruneau. 2022. The Persistence of Social Norms, Family Formation, and Gender Balance
in Politics. Politics & Gender 18:3, 708-740. [Crossref]
46. Eva Dziadula. 2022. Match quality and divorce among naturalized U.S. citizens. Southern Economic
Journal 89:1, 37-61. [Crossref]
47. Raed Abdel-Sater. 2022. Marriage Dissolution in the United States: A Survival Analysis Approach.
Journal of Divorce & Remarriage 63:4, 235-261. [Crossref]
48. Filip Dabergott. 2022. The gendered widowhood effect and social mortality gap. Population Studies
76:2, 295-307. [Crossref]
49. Rafael González-Val. 2022. House Prices and Marriage in Spain. Sustainability 14:5, 2848. [Crossref]
50. Marta Serra-Garcia. 2022. Risk Attitudes and Conflict in the Household. The Economic Journal
132:642, 767-795. [Crossref]
51. Hippolyte d’Albis, Karina Doorley, Elena Stancanelli. Older Mothers’ Employment and Marriage
Stability When the Nest IsEmpty 247-269. [Crossref]
52. Miriam Marcén, Marina Morales. Same-sex Marriage/Partnership 1-20. [Crossref]
53. Hans Fehr, Fabian Kindermann. The Insurance Role of the Family 1-31. [Crossref]
54. Hani Mansour, Terra McKinnish. 2022. Male Wage Inequality and Characteristics of "Early Mover"
Marriages. SSRN Electronic Journal 85. . [Crossref]
55. Congrong Ouyang, Sherman D. Hanna. 2022. The Effect of Racial/Ethnic Differences on the
Financial Obligations Ratio of Renters. SSRN Electronic Journal 83. . [Crossref]
56. Hani Mansour, Terra McKinnish. 2022. Male Wage Inequality and Characteristics of "Early Mover"
Marriages. SSRN Electronic Journal 85. . [Crossref]
57. Marco Francesconi, Robert A. Pollak, Domenico Tabasso. 2022. Unequal Bequests 1. SSRN Electronic
Journal 97. . [Crossref]
58. Takuma Kamada. 2022. The Family Consequences of Terrorism: The Effects of the Tokyo Subway
Sarin Attack on Marital Formation and Dissolution. Socius: Sociological Research for a Dynamic World
8, 237802312211371. [Crossref]
59. Arnaud Dupuy, Simon Weber. 2022. Marriage Market Counterfactuals Using Matching Models.
Economica 89:353, 29-43. [Crossref]
60. Maurício Benegas, José Raimundo Carvalho, Márcio Veras Corrêa. 2022. Non‐aggression
commitments and domestic violence margins. Economics of Transition and Institutional Change 30:1,
67-99. [Crossref]
61. Shuai Chen, Jan C. Ours. 2022. Mental health effects of same‐sex marriage legalization. Health
Economics 31:1, 42-56. [Crossref]
62. Fanny Landaud. 2021. From employment to engagement? Stable jobs, temporary jobs, and cohabiting
relationships. Labour Economics 73, 102077. [Crossref]
63. Qingyan Tong, Chi-Yang Chu, Dong Zhou, Yulei Feng. 2021. Does Internet Connectedness
Disconnect Marriage? A Micro Empirical Analysis. Social Indicators Research 158:1, 143-176.
[Crossref]
64. Clara E. Jace, Christos A. Makridis. 2021. Does marriage protect mental health? Evidence from the
COVID‐19 pandemic. Social Science Quarterly 102:6, 2499-2515. [Crossref]
65. Nikki Brendemuehl, Nicholas A. Jolly. 2021. Gender Differences in the Returns to Education over
Time for Married Couples. The B.E. Journal of Economic Analysis & Policy 21:4, 1257-1288. [Crossref]
66. Luise Görges. 2021. Of housewives and feminists: Gender norms and intra-household division of
labour. Labour Economics 72, 102044. [Crossref]
67. Xue Li, Dong Zhou. 2021. The Cultural Revolution and the Timing of First Marriage in China.
Canadian Studies in Population 48:2-3, 265-291. [Crossref]
68. Quentin Lippmann. 2021. From Material to Non-Material Needs? The Evolution of Mate Preferences
through the Twentieth Century in France. The Journal of Economic History 81:3, 831-871. [Crossref]
69. Marianne Bertrand, Patricia Cortes, Claudia Olivetti, Jessica Pan. 2021. Social Norms, Labour Market
Opportunities, and the Marriage Gap Between Skilled and Unskilled Women. The Review of Economic
Studies 88:4, 1936-1978. [Crossref]
70. Heather H. Kelley, Ashley B. LeBaron, E. Jeffrey Hill. 2021. Family Matters: Decade Review from
Journal of Family and Economic Issues. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 42:S1, 20-33. [Crossref]
71. Jingsong Zhu, Bing Guo, Yingting Luo, Jianxin Pan. 2021. A feasible method for training classified
data with sparsity. Journal of Physics: Conference Series 1978:1, 012067. [Crossref]
72. Martha J. Bailey, Emily A. Beam, Anna Wentz. 2021. Does younger age at marriage affect divorce?
Evidence from Johnson's Executive Order 11241. Economic Inquiry 59:3, 1328-1345. [Crossref]
73. Young-Il Kim, Jungmin Lee. 2021. Does single pregnancy hurt birth outcomes among young
mothers?. Journal of Demographic Economics 45, 1-33. [Crossref]
74. Héctor Bellido, Miriam Marcén. 2021. Will you marry me? It depends (on the business cycle). Review
of Economics of the Household 19:2, 551-579. [Crossref]
75. Pilar Gonalons-Pons, Markus Gangl. 2021. Marriage and Masculinity: Male-Breadwinner Culture,
Unemployment, and Separation Risk in 29 Countries. American Sociological Review 86:3, 465-502.
[Crossref]
76. Tural BAYRAMOV. 2021. Guba-Khachmaz (Azerbaycan Cumhuriyeti Kuzey-Doğu Bölgesi) İktisadiCoğrafi Bölgesindeki Yerleşimlerden Evlilik ve Boşanma Dinamikleri. Afet ve Risk Dergisi 4:1, 107-120.
[Crossref]
77. Pengcheng Liu, Jingjing Cao, Wenjie Nie, Xiaojie Wang, Yani Tian, Cheng Ma. 2021. The Influence
of Internet Usage Frequency on Women’s Fertility Intentions—The Mediating Effects of Gender Role
Attitudes. International Journal of Environmental Research and Public Health 18:9, 4784. [Crossref]
78. Lucia Mangiavacchi, Luca Piccoli, Chiara Rapallini. 2021. Personality Traits and Household
Consumption Choices. The B.E. Journal of Economic Analysis & Policy 21:2, 433-468. [Crossref]
79. Martin Browning, Olivier Donni, Mette Gørtz. 2021. Do you have time to take a walk together?
Private and joint time within the household. The Economic Journal 131:635, 1051-1080. [Crossref]
80. Peter Fallesen. 2021. Who Reacts to Less Restrictive Divorce Laws?. Journal of Marriage and Family
83:2, 608-619. [Crossref]
81. Marko Korhonen, Mikko Puhakka. 2021. The Behavior of Divorce Rates: A Smooth Transition
Regression Approach. Journal of Time Series Econometrics 13:1, 1-19. [Crossref]
82. Tural BAYRAMOV. 2021. Dynamics of Marriages & Divorces by Settlements in the EconomicGeographic Region of Guba-Khachmaz. Equinox Journal of Economics Business and Political Studies
. [Crossref]
83. Shuai Chen, Jan C. van Ours. Happiness and Partnerships 1-15. [Crossref]
84. Thaddeus J. Kubisiak. Unpaid Labor and the Quest for Equality 1-9. [Crossref]
85. Thaddeus J. Kubisiak. Unpaid Labor and the Quest for Equality 875-882. [Crossref]
86. Bernd Frick. Arbeitsmarkt Profisport 709-724. [Crossref]
87. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Karen A. Kopecky. The wife's protector: a quantitative theory
linking contraceptive technology with the decline in marriage 903-943. [Crossref]
88.David Card, Dean R. Hyslop. 2021. Female Earnings Inequality: The Changing Role of Family
Characteristics and Its Effect on the Extensive and Intensive Margins. Journal of Labor Economics
39:S1, S59-S106. [Crossref]
89. Ismael Mourifié, Aloysius Siow. 2021. The Cobb-Douglas Marriage Matching Function: Marriage
Matching with Peer and Scale Effects. Journal of Labor Economics 39:S1, S239-S274. [Crossref]
90. Peter Fallesen. 2021. Decline in Rate of Divorce and Separation Filings in Denmark in 2020 Compared
with Previous Years. Socius: Sociological Research for a Dynamic World 7, 237802312110099. [Crossref]
91. Ariel Binder. 2021. Why Bother? The Effect of Declining Marriage Market Prospects on LaborForce Participation by Young Men. SSRN Electronic Journal 110. . [Crossref]
92. Osea Giuntella, Lorenzo Rotunno, Luca Stella. 2021. Trade Shocks, Fertility, and Marital Behavior.
SSRN Electronic Journal 34. . [Crossref]
93. Lauren Hoehn-Velasco, Jose Roberto Balmori de la Miyar, Adan Silverio-Murillo, Sherajum Monira
Farin. 2021. Till the Lockdown Do Us Part: Examining the Impact of the COVID-19 Pandemic on
Marital Formation and Dissolution. SSRN Electronic Journal 35. . [Crossref]
94. Misty L. Heggeness. 2020. Estimating the immediate impact of the COVID-19 shock on parental
attachment to the labor market and the double bind of mothers. Review of Economics of the Household
18:4, 1053-1078. [Crossref]
95. Scott Drewianka, Martin E. Meder. 2020. Simultaneity and selection in financial hardship and divorce.
Review of Economics of the Household 18:4, 1245-1265. [Crossref]
96. Antonius D. Skipper, Douglas S. Bates, Zachary D. Blizard, Richard G. Moye. 2020. Charged with
Instability: Are Paternal Arrests and Criminal Charges Enough to Shake the Marital Stability of
American Couples?. Journal of Family Issues 41:12, 2423-2447. [Crossref]
97. Rania Gihleb, Kevin Lang. Educational Homogamy and Assortative Mating Have Not Increased *
1-26. [Crossref]
98. Molly R. Franz, Anica Pless Kaiser, Rebecca J. Phillips, Lewina O. Lee, Amy E. Lawrence, Casey T.
Taft, Jennifer J. Vasterling. 2020. Associations of warzone veteran mental health with partner mental
health and family functioning: Family Foundations Study. Depression and Anxiety 37:11, 1068-1078.
[Crossref]
99. Christopher S. Carpenter. 2020. The Direct Effects of Legal Same-Sex Marriage in the United States:
Evidence From Massachusetts. Demography 57:5, 1787-1808. [Crossref]
100. Alicia H. Munnell, Geoffrey Sanzenbacher, Alice Zulkarnain. 2020. What Factors Explain the Decline
in Widowed Women’s Poverty?. Demography 57:5, 1881-1902. [Crossref]
101. Shuai Chen, Jan C. van Ours. 2020. Symbolism matters: The effect of same-sex marriage legalization
on partnership stability. Journal of Economic Behavior & Organization 178, 44-58. [Crossref]
102. Héctor Bellido, Miriam Marcén. 2020. On the relationship between body mass index and marital
dissolution. Economic Modelling 91, 326-340. [Crossref]
103. Ang Sun, Qinghua Zhang. 2020. Who marries whom in a surging housing market?☆. Journal of
Development Economics 146, 102492. [Crossref]
104. Michael Shepard, Michael Betz, Anastasia Snyder. 2020. The Shale Boom and Family Structure: Oil
and Gas Employment Growth Relationship to Marriage, Divorce, and Cohabitation. Rural Sociology
85:3, 623-657. [Crossref]
105. Arna Olafsson, Herdis Steingrimsdottir. 2020. How Does Daddy at Home Affect Marital Stability?.
The Economic Journal 130:629, 1471-1500. [Crossref]
106. Francesca Adler‐Baeder, Brian Higginbotham. 2020. Efforts to Design, Implement, and Evaluate
Community‐Based Education for Stepfamilies: Current Knowledge and Future Directions. Family
Relations 69:3, 559-576. [Crossref]
107.David G. Schramm, Emily H. Becher. 2020. Common Practices for Divorce Education. Family
Relations 69:3, 543-558. [Crossref]
108. Susan L. Averett, Cynthia Bansak, Julie K. Smith. 2020. Behind Every High Earning Man is a
Conscientious Woman: The Impact of Spousal Personality on Earnings and Marriage. Journal of
Family and Economic Issues 9. . [Crossref]
109. Brian J. Willoughby, Spencer James, Ian Marsee, Madison Memmott, Renée Peltz Dennison. 2020.
“I’m Scared because Divorce Sucks”: Parental Divorce and the Marital Paradigms of Emerging Adults.
Journal of Family Issues 41:6, 711-738. [Crossref]
110.Daniela Bellani. 2020. The institutional and cultural framing of the educational stratification in
fertility. A review of the role of labor market institutions and attitudinal orientations. Research in
Social Stratification and Mobility 66, 100482. [Crossref]
111.Daniel I. Tannenbaum. 2020. The Effect of Child Support on Selection into Marriage and Fertility.
Journal of Labor Economics 38:2, 611-652. [Crossref]
112. Ingmar Rapp, Johannes Stauder. 2020. Mental and Physical Health in Couple Relationships: Is It
Better to Live Together?. European Sociological Review 36:2, 303-316. [Crossref]
113. Sara Lopus, Margaret Frye. 2020. Intramarital Status Differences Across Africa's Educational
Expansion. Journal of Marriage and Family 82:2, 733-750. [Crossref]
114. Andrew A. Alola, Abdulgaffar O. Arikewuyo, Seyi S. Akadiri, Mary I. Alola. 2020. The role of income
and gender unemployment in divorce rate among the OECD countries. Journal of Labor and Society
23:1, 75-86. [Crossref]
115. Stephanie N. Webb, Phillip S. Kavanagh, Jill M. Chonody. 2020. Straight, LGB, Married, Living in
Sin, Children Out of Wedlock: A Comparison of Attitudes Towards ‘Different’ Family Structures.
Journal of GLBT Family Studies 16:1, 66-82. [Crossref]
116. Jordan Neyland. 2020. Love or money: The effect of CEO divorce on firm risk and compensation.
Journal of Corporate Finance 60, 101507. [Crossref]
117. Edoardo Ciscato, Alfred Galichon, Marion Goussé. 2020. Like Attract Like? A Structural Comparison
of Homogamy across Same-Sex and Different-Sex Households. Journal of Political Economy 128:2,
740-781. [Crossref]
118. Edoardo Ciscato, Simon Weber. 2020. The role of evolving marital preferences in growing income
inequality. Journal of Population Economics 33:1, 307-347. [Crossref]
119. Julia Hatamyar. 2020. Outside Options, Job Mobility, and Gender: Evidence from Divorce Laws.
SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
120. Ning Zhang. 2020. Housing Vouchers, Labor Supply and Household Formation: A Structural
Approach. SSRN Electronic Journal 98. . [Crossref]
121. Michael Wagner. On Increasing Divorce Risks 37-61. [Crossref]
122. Klaus Deininger, Songqing Jin, Hari K. Nagarajan, Fang Xia. 2019. Inheritance Law Reform,
Empowerment, and Human Capital Accumulation: Second-Generation Effects from India. The
Journal of Development Studies 55:12, 2549-2571. [Crossref]
123. Pinka Chatterji, Xiangshi Liu, Barış K. Yörük. 2019. The effects of the 2010 Affordable Care Act
dependent care provision on family structure and public program participation among young adults.
Review of Economics of the Household 17:4, 1133-1161. [Crossref]
124. Giacomo Vagni. 2019. Alone Together: Gender Inequalities in Couple Time. Social Indicators Research
146:3, 487-509. [Crossref]
125.Dario Sansone. 2019. Pink work: Same-sex marriage, employment and discrimination. Journal of
Public Economics 180, 104086. [Crossref]
126. Oscar Erixson, Henry Ohlsson. 2019. Estate division: equal sharing, exchange motives, and Cinderella
effects. Journal of Population Economics 32:4, 1437-1480. [Crossref]
127. Viola Angelini, Marco Bertoni, Luca Stella, Christoph T. Weiss. 2019. The ant or the grasshopper?
The long-term consequences of Unilateral Divorce Laws on savings of European households.
European Economic Review 119, 97-113. [Crossref]
128. Nathan Seltzer. 2019. Beyond the Great Recession: Labor Market Polarization and Ongoing Fertility
Decline in the United States. Demography 56:4, 1463-1493. [Crossref]
129. Marcel Fischer, Natalia Khorunzhina. 2019. HOUSING DECISION WITH DIVORCE RISK.
International Economic Review 60:3, 1263-1290. [Crossref]
130. Frank F. Furstenberg. 2019. Family Change in Global Perspective: How and Why Family Systems
Change. Family Relations 68:3, 326-341. [Crossref]
131. Miriam Marcén, Marina Morales. 2019. Live together: does culture matter?. Review of Economics of
the Household 17:2, 671-713. [Crossref]
132. Arun S. Hendi. 2019. Proximate Sources of Change in Trajectories of First Marriage in the United
States, 1960–2010. Demography 56:3, 835-862. [Crossref]
133. Carlos Bethencourt. 2019. The living arrangements of elderly widows, their children, and their
children's spouses. Journal of Demographic Economics 85:2, 95-121. [Crossref]
134. Ariel J. Binder, John Bound. 2019. The Declining Labor Market Prospects of Less-Educated Men.
Journal of Economic Perspectives 33:2, 163-190. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
135. Courtney C. Coile, Mark G. Duggan. 2019. When Labor’s Lost: Health, Family Life, Incarceration,
and Education in a Time of Declining Economic Opportunity for Low-Skilled Men. Journal of
Economic Perspectives 33:2, 191-210. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
136.David W. Rasmussen. 2019. The Rights/Development Nexus: Sen, Olson, and the Obesity Rights
Movement*. Social Science Quarterly 100:3, 923-935. [Crossref]
137. Peter A. Savelyev, Kegon T. K. Tan. 2019. Socioemotional Skills, Education, and Health-Related
Outcomes of High-Ability Individuals. American Journal of Health Economics 5:2, 250-280. [Crossref]
138. Catherine B. McNamee, Lisa Smyth. 2019. The Different Roles of Parents and Friends: Support
for Divorce and Repartnering Following Martial Dissolution among Latina and White Women.
Sociological Perspectives 62:2, 186-199. [Crossref]
139. Shilin Zheng, Yuwei Duan, Michael R. Ward. 2019. The effect of broadband internet on divorce in
China. Technological Forecasting and Social Change 139, 99-114. [Crossref]
140. Christina Salama, Jeffrey B. Jackson, Sesen Negash, Manijeh Daneshpour. 2019. Family of Origin
Predictors of Marital Outcomes Among Coptic Orthodox Christian Egyptian-American Couples.
Journal of Couple & Relationship Therapy 18:1, 44-64. [Crossref]
141. Robert A. Pollak. 2019. How Bargaining in Marriage Drives Marriage Market Equilibrium. Journal
of Labor Economics 37:1, 297-321. [Crossref]
142. Bernd Frick. Arbeitsmarkt Profisport 1-16. [Crossref]
143. Michael John Stones, Katie Lemmetty, Lee Stones. Sexuality, Sensuality and Intimacy . [Crossref]
144. Shinichi Nishiyama. 2019. The joint labor supply decision of married couples and the U.S. Social
Security pension system. Review of Economic Dynamics 31, 277-304. [Crossref]
145. Jennie Brand, Ravaris Moore, Xi Song, Yu Xie. 2019. Why Does Parental Divorce Lower Children’s
Educational Attainment? A Causal Mediation Analysis. Sociological Science 6, 264-292. [Crossref]
146. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Karen A. Kopecky. 2019. The Wife's Protector: The Effect of
Contraception on Marriage during the 20th Century. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
147. Lowell Hargens. 2019. Incidence of first-marriage divorce among women in the 1979 panel of the
National Longitudinal Survey of Youth. Demographic Research 40, 1529-1536. [Crossref]
148. Nicola Barban, Maria Sironi. Sequence Analysis as a Tool for Family Demography 101-123. [Crossref]
149. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Karen A. Kopecky. 2019. The Wife's Protector: A Quantitative
Theory Linking Contraceptive Technology with the Decline in Marriage. SSRN Electronic Journal
108. . [Crossref]
150. Menghan Zhao. 2018. From Motherhood Premium to Motherhood Penalty? Heterogeneous Effects
of Motherhood Stages on Women’s Economic Outcomes in Urban China. Population Research and
Policy Review 37:6, 967-1002. [Crossref]
151. Shuai Chen, Jan C. van Ours. 2018. Subjective Well-being and Partnership Dynamics: Are Same-Sex
Relationships Different?. Demography 55:6, 2299-2320. [Crossref]
152. Le Minh Tu, Dinh Hong Linh, Nguyen Dac Dung, Aaron Kingsbury. 2018. The impact of
unemployment on the resiliency of couples:A case study of Germany. Economic Analysis and Policy
60, 62-68. [Crossref]
153. Claire M. Kamp Dush, Bohyun Jang, Anastasia R. Snyder. 2018. A cohort comparison of predictors
of young adult union formation and dissolution in the US. Advances in Life Course Research 38, 37-49.
[Crossref]
154. H. Colleen Stuart, Sue H. Moon, Tiziana Casciaro. Chapter 13 Penalty for Success? Career
Achievement and Gender Differences in Divorce 265-289. [Crossref]
155. Kim Caarls, Helga A. G. de Valk. 2018. Regional Diffusion of Divorce in Turkey. European Journal
of Population 34:4, 609-636. [Crossref]
156. Fred A. Luchette. 2018. So many commitments with so little time: Can our profession survive?.
Surgery 164:4, 605-613. [Crossref]
157. Melissa Ruby Banzhaf. 2018. When It Rains, It Pours: Under What Circumstances Does Job Loss
Lead to Divorce. Southern Economic Journal 85:2, 349-377. [Crossref]
158. Rami Bou Khalil. 2018. The “concept-reality mismatch” in the globalization era as a psychosocial
stressor contributing to the occurrence of mental disorders. Early Intervention in Psychiatry 12:5,
1006-1009. [Crossref]
159. Pierre–André Chiappori, Natalia Radchenko, Bernard Salanié. 2018. Divorce and the duality of marital
payoff. Review of Economics of the Household 16:3, 833-858. [Crossref]
160. Ingmar Rapp. 2018. Partnership Formation in Young and Older Age. Journal of Family Issues 39:13,
3363-3390. [Crossref]
161. Nick Frazier, Margaret McKeehan. 2018. Hesitating at the Altar. Public Finance Review 46:5, 743-763.
[Crossref]
162. Kamila Cygan-Rehm, Daniel Kuehnle, Regina T. Riphahn. 2018. Paid parental leave and families’
living arrangements. Labour Economics 53, 182-197. [Crossref]
163.Daniel Schneider, Kristen Harknett, Matthew Stimpson. 2018. What Explains the Decline in First
Marriage in the United States? Evidence from the Panel Study of Income Dynamics, 1969 to 2013.
Journal of Marriage and Family 80:4, 791-811. [Crossref]
164. Julia Mikolai, Ann Berrington, Brienna Perelli-Harris. 2018. The role of education in the intersection
of partnership transitions and motherhood in Europe and the United States. Demographic Research
39, 753-794. [Crossref]
165. Rafael González-Val, Miriam Marcén. 2018. Club Classification of US Divorce Rates. The Manchester
School 86:4, 512-532. [Crossref]
166. Pamela Rollins, Amanda Williams, Pat Sims. 2018. Family Dynamics: Family-of-Origin Cohesion
During Adolescence and Adult Romantic Relationships. Contemporary Family Therapy 40:2, 128-137.
[Crossref]
167. Claire M. Kamp Dush, Jill E. Yavorsky, Sarah J. Schoppe-Sullivan. 2018. What Are Men Doing while
Women Perform Extra Unpaid Labor? Leisure and Specialization at the Transitions to Parenthood.
Sex Roles 78:11-12, 715-730. [Crossref]
168. Mary Ann Bronson, Maurizio Mazzocco. 2018. A MORE MEASURED APPROACH: AN
EVALUATION OF DIFFERENT MEASURES OF MARRIAGE RATES AND IMPLICATIONS
FOR FAMILY ECONOMICS. Journal of Demographic Economics 84:2, 189-207. [Crossref]
169. Mengni Chen, Paul S. F. Yip. 2018. Decomposing the crude divorce rate in five countries: Singapore,
Taiwan, South Korea, the UK, and Australia. Asian Population Studies 14:2, 137-152. [Crossref]
170. Ryan D. Edwards. 2018. If My Blood Pressure Is High, Do I Take It to Heart? Behavioral Effects of
Biomarker Collection in the Health and Retirement Study. Demography 55:2, 403-434. [Crossref]
171. Gábor Hajdu, Tamás Hajdu. 2018. Intra-Couple Income Distribution and Subjective Well-Being:
The Moderating Effect of Gender Norms. European Sociological Review 34:2, 138-156. [Crossref]
172. Zheng Wu, Margaret J. Penning. 2018. Marital and Cohabiting Union Dissolution in Middle and
Later Life. Research on Aging 40:4, 340-364. [Crossref]
173. Letizia Mencarini, Daniele Vignoli. 2018. Employed Women and Marital Union Stability: It Helps
When Men Help. Journal of Family Issues 39:5, 1348-1373. [Crossref]
174. Rafael González-Val, Miriam Marcén. 2018. Unemployment, marriage and divorce. Applied Economics
50:13, 1495-1508. [Crossref]
175. Joanna R. Pepin, Liana C. Sayer, Lynne M. Casper. 2018. Marital Status and Mothers’ Time Use:
Childcare, Housework, Leisure, and Sleep. Demography 55:1, 107-133. [Crossref]
176. Jeffrey Neilson, Maria Stanfors. 2018. Time Alone or Together? Trends and Trade‐offs Among Dual‐
Earner Couples, Sweden 1990–2010. Journal of Marriage and Family 80:1, 80-98. [Crossref]
177. Sekyu Choi, Arnau Valladares-Esteban. 2018. The marriage unemployment gap. The B.E. Journal of
Macroeconomics 18:1. . [Crossref]
178. Gonzalo Aza Blanc. Internet Infidelity in the Cultural Framework of Spain 85-104. [Crossref]
179. M. Brandl, B. Maris. 2018. Der Beginn des Lebens? Gedanken zu ärztlichen Grenzkonflikten. Der
Merkurstab 71:3, 214-220. [Crossref]
180. Michael Geruso, Heather Royer. 2018. The Impact of Education on Family Formation: QuasiExperimental Evidence from the UK. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
181. Breno Braga. 2018. The Effects of Unilateral Trade Liberalization on Marriage and Fertility Choices:
Evidence from Brazil. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
182.Dario Sansone. 2018. Pink Work: Same-Sex Marriage, Employment and Discrimination. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
183. Alicia Munnell, Geoffrey Sanzenbacher, Alice Zulkarnain. 2018. What Factors Explain the Decline
in Widows' Poverty?. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
184. Ariel Binder. 2018. Inter-Generational Transmission and the 21st Century Rise in Skilled Mothers'
Labor Supply. SSRN Electronic Journal 115. . [Crossref]
185.Daniele Vignoli, Anna Matysiak, Marta Styrc, Valentina Tocchioni. 2018. The positive impact of
women’s employment on divorce: Context, selection, or anticipation?. Demographic Research 38,
1059-1110. [Crossref]
186. Congrong Ouyang, Sherman D. Hanna. 2018. The Effects of Financial Literacy Overconfidence on
the Financial Obligations of Renters and Homeowners. SSRN Electronic Journal 100. . [Crossref]
187. Marianne Bertrand, Patricia Cortes, Claudia Olivetti, Jessica Pan. 2018. Social Norms, Labor Market
Opportunities, and the Marriage Gap for Skilled Women. SSRN Electronic Journal 115. . [Crossref]
188. Michela Carlana, Marco Tabellini. 2018. Happily Ever after: Immigration, Natives’ Marriage, and
Fertility. SSRN Electronic Journal 15. . [Crossref]
189. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Guillaume Vandenbroucke. 2017. Family Economics Writ Large.
Journal of Economic Literature 55:4, 1346-1434. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
190. Jennifer Klein. 2017. House Price Shocks and Individual Divorce Risk in the United States. Journal
of Family and Economic Issues 38:4, 628-649. [Crossref]
191. Shoichi Sasaki. 2017. Empirical analysis of the effects of increasing wage inequalities on marriage
behaviors in Japan. Journal of the Japanese and International Economies 46, 27-42. [Crossref]
192. Alessio Moro, Solmaz Moslehi, Satoshi Tanaka. 2017. MARRIAGE AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT IN THE TWENTIETH CENTURY. Journal of Demographic Economics 83:4,
379-420. [Crossref]
193. Shelly Lundberg, Aloysius Siow. 2017. Canadian contributions to family economics. Canadian Journal
of Economics/Revue canadienne d'économique 50:5, 1304-1323. [Crossref]
194. Stephanie N. Webb, Jill Chonody, Phillip S. Kavanagh. 2017. “If You Don't Like Gay Marriage, Don't
Get One!”: A Qualitative Analysis of Attitudes Toward Same-Sex Marriage in South Australia. Journal
of GLBT Family Studies 13:5, 439-458. [Crossref]
195. Gerald Eric Daniels, Venoo Kakar, Anoshua Chaudhuri. 2017. Racial Differences in Transitions to
Marriage for Unmarried Mothers. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 38:3, 370-389. [Crossref]
196. Rafael González-Val, Miriam Marcén. 2017. Divorce and the business cycle: a cross-country analysis.
Review of Economics of the Household 15:3, 879-904. [Crossref]
197. ZHIMING CHENG, RUSSELL SMYTH. 2017. CHINA’S IMBALANCED SEX RATIO AND
SATISFACTION WITH MARRIAGE. The Singapore Economic Review 62:04, 765-782. [Crossref]
198. Pierre-André Chiappori, Bernard Salanié, Yoram Weiss. 2017. Partner Choice, Investment in
Children, and the Marital College Premium. American Economic Review 107:8, 2109-2167. [Abstract]
[View PDF article] [PDF with links]
199. Petter Lundborg, Erik Plug, Astrid Würtz Rasmussen. 2017. Can Women Have Children and a
Career? IV Evidence from IVF Treatments. American Economic Review 107:6, 1611-1637. [Abstract]
[View PDF article] [PDF with links]
200. Peter T. Leeson, Joshua Pierson. 2017. Economic origins of the no-fault divorce revolution. European
Journal of Law and Economics 43:3, 419-439. [Crossref]
201. Paraskevi K. Salamaliki. 2017. Births, Marriages, and the Economic Environment in Greece: Empirical
Evidence Over Time. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 38:2, 218-237. [Crossref]
202. Rahul Suresh Sapkal. 2017. From Mother to Daughter: Does Equal Inheritance Property Laws Reform
Improve Female Labor Supply and Educational Attainments in India?. Asian Journal of Law and
Economics 8:1. . [Crossref]
203. Somayeh Parvazian, Judith Gill, Belinda Chiera. 2017. Higher Education, Women, and Sociocultural
Change: A Closer Look at the Statistics. SAGE Open 7:2, 215824401770023. [Crossref]
204.Daniele Vignoli, Elena Pirani, Alessandra Venturini. 2017. Female Migration and Native Marital
Stability: Insights from Italy. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 38:1, 118-128. [Crossref]
205. Fabrizio Bernardi, Diederik Boertien. 2017. Non-intact families and diverging educational destinies: A
decomposition analysis for Germany, Italy, the United Kingdom and the United States. Social Science
Research 63, 181-191. [Crossref]
206. Chinhui Juhn, Kristin McCue. 2017. Specialization Then and Now: Marriage, Children, and the
Gender Earnings Gap across Cohorts. Journal of Economic Perspectives 31:1, 183-204. [Abstract] [View
PDF article] [PDF with links]
207. Andriana Bellou. 2017. Male wage inequality and marital dissolution: Is there a link?. Canadian
Journal of Economics/Revue canadienne d'économique 50:1, 40-71. [Crossref]
208. Andreas Schmitz. Online Dating – A Meeting Point for the Modern Individual and Traditional
Individualism 13-28. [Crossref]
209. Andreas Schmitz. Classical Theories of Mate Choice and the Relational Deficit in the Study of
Relationship Formation 43-83. [Crossref]
210. Laura Bottazzi, Paolo Manasse, Sarah Grace See. 2017. Better Wed Over the Mixen than Over the
Moor? Break-Ups of Inter-Ethnic Marriages in Italy. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
211.David W. Rasmussen. 2017. The Rights/Development Nexus: Sen, Olson and the Obesity Rights
Movement. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
212. Emiel Jerphanion. 2017. Premarital Investment in Human Capital & Marriage Returns. SSRN
Electronic Journal 108. . [Crossref]
213. Shuai Chen, Jan C. van Ours. 2017. Subjective Well-Being and Partnership Dynamics: Are Same-Sex
Relationships Different?. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
214. Shuai Chen, Jan C. van Ours. 2017. Subjective Well-Being and Partnership Dynamics; Are Same-Sex
Relationships Different. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
215. Josue Ortega, Philipp Hergovich. 2017. The Strength of Absent Ties: Social Integration via Online
Dating. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
216. Alan Piper, Ian Breckenridge-Jackson. 2017. She's Leaving Home: A Large Sample Investigation of
the Empty Nest Syndrome. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
217. Katie R. Genadek, Sarah M. Flood, Joan Garcia Roman. 2016. Trends in Spouses’ Shared Time in
the United States, 1965–2012. Demography 53:6, 1801-1820. [Crossref]
218. Peter Fallesen, Richard Breen. 2016. Temporary Life Changes and the Timing of Divorce.
Demography 53:5, 1377-1398. [Crossref]
219. Hans Fehr, Manuel Kallweit, Fabian Kindermann. 2016. Household Formation, Female Labor Supply,
and Savings. The Scandinavian Journal of Economics 118:4, 868-911. [Crossref]
220. Sanna Huikari, Marko Korhonen, Mikko Puhakka. 2016. ’Til booze do us part: alcohol consumption
and marital dissolution. Empirical Economics 51:2, 831-852. [Crossref]
221. Nadia Simoes, Nuno Crespo, Sandrina B. Moreira. 2016. INDIVIDUAL DETERMINANTS OF
SELF-EMPLOYMENT ENTRY: WHAT DO WE REALLY KNOW?. Journal of Economic Surveys
30:4, 783-806. [Crossref]
222. Alexandra Killewald. 2016. Money, Work, and Marital Stability. American Sociological Review 81:4,
696-719. [Crossref]
223. Mehmet Bac. 2016. The expectation effect of a fall in divorce costs. International Review of Law and
Economics 47, 41-47. [Crossref]
224. Héctor Bellido, Miriam Marcén, José Alberto Molina. 2016. The Effect of Culture on Fertility
Behavior of US Teen Mothers. Feminist Economics 22:3, 101-126. [Crossref]
225. Héctor Bellido, José Alberto Molina, Anne Solaz, Elena Stancanelli. 2016. Do children of the first
marriage deter divorce?. Economic Modelling 55, 15-31. [Crossref]
226. Casey Boyd-Swan, Chris M. Herbst, John Ifcher, Homa Zarghamee. 2016. The earned income
tax credit, mental health, and happiness. Journal of Economic Behavior & Organization 126, 18-38.
[Crossref]
227. Małgorzata Mikucka. 2016. The Life Satisfaction Advantage of Being Married and Gender
Specialization. Journal of Marriage and Family 78:3, 759-779. [Crossref]
228. Chinhui Juhn, Kristin McCue. 2016. Evolution of the Marriage Earnings Gap for Women. American
Economic Review 106:5, 252-256. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
229. Shelly Lundberg, Robert A. Pollak, Jenna Stearns. 2016. Family Inequality: Diverging Patterns in
Marriage, Cohabitation, and Childbearing. Journal of Economic Perspectives 30:2, 79-102. [Abstract]
[View PDF article] [PDF with links]
230. Cezar Santos, David Weiss. 2016. “WHY NOT SETTLE DOWN ALREADY?” A
QUANTITATIVE ANALYSIS OF THE DELAY IN MARRIAGE. International Economic Review
57:2, 425-452. [Crossref]
231. Cheng Cheng. 2016. Does simplifying divorce and marriage registration matter? Evidence from China.
Applied Economics 48:17, 1560-1572. [Crossref]
232. Jisoo Hwang. 2016. Housewife, “gold miss,” and equal: the evolution of educated women’s role in
Asia and the U.S. Journal of Population Economics 29:2, 529-570. [Crossref]
233. Martin Halla, Mario Lackner, Johann Scharler. 2016. Does the Welfare State Destroy the Family?
Evidence from OECD Member Countries. The Scandinavian Journal of Economics 118:2, 292-323.
[Crossref]
234. Marcus Dillender. 2016. Social Security and Divorce. The B.E. Journal of Economic Analysis & Policy
16:2, 931-971. [Crossref]
235. Kirsten Cornelson, Aloysius Siow. 2016. A Quantitative Review of Marriage Markets: How Inequality
is Remaking the American Family by Carbone and Cahn. Journal of Economic Literature 54:1, 193-207.
[Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
236. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Georgi Kocharkov, Cezar Santos. 2016. Technology and the
Changing Family: A Unified Model of Marriage, Divorce, Educational Attainment, and Married
Female Labor-Force Participation. American Economic Journal: Macroeconomics 8:1, 1-41. [Abstract]
[View PDF article] [PDF with links]
237. Yunita Sari, Septiawan Santana Kurnia, Yuhka Sundaya. 2016. The Risk of Divorce: Style of
Communication, Stages of Family Development, and Type of Socioeconomic Status. International
Journal of Culture and History (EJournal) 2:1, 5-8. [Crossref]
238. Marion Gousss, Nicolas Jacquemet, Jean-Marc Robin. 2016. Marriage, Labor Supply, and Home
Production: A Longitudinal Microeconomic Analysis of Marriage, Intra-Household Bargaining and
Time Use Using the BHPS, 1991-2008. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
239. Marianne Bertrand, Patricia Cortes, Claudia Olivetti, Jessica Pan. 2016. Social Norms, Labor Market
Opportunities, and the Marriage Gap for Skilled Women. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
240. Hanzhe Zhang. 2016. A Marriage-Market Perspective of the College Gender Gap. SSRN Electronic
Journal 4. . [Crossref]
241. Gerald Eric Daniels, Venoo Kakar, Anoshua Chaudhuri. 2016. Racial Differences in Transitions to
Marriage for Unmarried Mothers. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
242. Boris Nikolaev. 2015. Living with mom and dad and loving it…or Are you?. Journal of Economic
Psychology 51, 199-209. [Crossref]
243. Per Gustafson, Urban Fransson. 2015. Age Differences Between Spouses: Sociodemographic Variation
and Selection. Marriage & Family Review 51:7, 610-632. [Crossref]
244. Mary Blair-Loy, Arlie Hochschild, Allison J. Pugh, Joan C. Williams, Heidi Hartmann. 2015.
Stability and transformation in gender, work, and family: insights from the second shift for the next
quarter century. Community, Work & Family 18:4, 435-454. [Crossref]
245. Kevin Lang, Russell Weinstein. 2015. The Consequences of Teenage Childbearing before Roe v.
Wade. American Economic Journal: Applied Economics 7:4, 169-197. [Abstract] [View PDF article]
[PDF with links]
246. Michael Bar, Seik Kim, Oksana Leukhina. 2015. Gender Wage Gap Accounting: The Role of Selection
Bias. Demography 52:5, 1729-1750. [Crossref]
247. Fatih Guvenen, Michelle Rendall. 2015. Women's emancipation through education: A macroeconomic
analysis. Review of Economic Dynamics 18:4, 931-956. [Crossref]
248. Nathan R. Hardy, Kristy L. Soloski, G. Cole Ratcliffe, Jared R. Anderson, Brian J. Willoughby. 2015.
Associations Between Family of Origin Climate, Relationship Self‐Regulation, and Marital Outcomes.
Journal of Marital and Family Therapy 41:4, 508-521. [Crossref]
249. Cheng Chen, Shin-Yi Chou, Robert J. Thornton. 2015. The Effect of Household Technology on
Weight and Health Outcomes among Chinese Adults: Evidence from China’s “Home Appliances
Going to the Countryside” Policy. Journal of Human Capital 9:3, 364-401. [Crossref]
250. Amelia Karraker, Kenzie Latham. 2015. In Sickness and in Health? Physical Illness as a Risk Factor
for Marital Dissolution in Later Life. Journal of Health and Social Behavior 56:3, 420-435. [Crossref]
251. Jane Dokko, Geng Li, Jessica Hayes. 2015. Credit Scores and Committed Relationships. Finance and
Economics Discussion Series 2015:81, 1-57. [Crossref]
252. Alessandra Voena. 2015. Yours, Mine, and Ours: Do Divorce Laws Affect the Intertemporal Behavior
of Married Couples?. American Economic Review 105:8, 2295-2332. [Abstract] [View PDF article]
[PDF with links]
253. Ausra Maslauskaite, Aiva Jasilioniene, Domantas Jasilionis, Vladislava Stankuniene, Vladimir M.
Shkolnikov. 2015. Socio-economic determinants of divorce in Lithuania: Evidence from register-based
census-linked data. Demographic Research 33, 871-908. [Crossref]
254. Marko Korhonen, Mikko Puhakka. 2015. Revisiting unit roots in divorce rates. Applied Economics
Letters 22:8, 628-631. [Crossref]
255. M. Graça Pereira, Henrique Pinto. 2015. Women’s Perception of Separation/Divorce in Portugal: A
Sociodemographic Profile. Journal of Divorce & Remarriage 56:4, 300-316. [Crossref]
256. Andriana Bellou. 2015. The impact of Internet diffusion on marriage rates: evidence from the
broadband market. Journal of Population Economics 28:2, 265-297. [Crossref]
257.D. De La Croix, F. Mariani. 2015. From Polygyny to Serial Monogamy: A Unified Theory of Marriage
Institutions. The Review of Economic Studies 82:2, 565-607. [Crossref]
258. Hideki Ariizumi, Yaqin Hu, Tammy Schirle. 2015. Stand together or alone? Family structure and the
business cycle in Canada. Review of Economics of the Household 13:1, 135-161. [Crossref]
259. Julie M. Zissimopoulos, Benjamin R. Karney, Amy J. Rauer. 2015. Marriage and economic well being
at older ages. Review of Economics of the Household 13:1, 1-35. [Crossref]
260. M. Bac. 2015. On the Selection Effects Under Consent and Unilateral Divorce. American Law and
Economics Review 17:1, 43-86. [Crossref]
261. Mircea Trandafir. 2015. Legal Recognition of Same-Sex Couples and Family Formation. Demography
52:1, 113-151. [Crossref]
262. Shelly Lundberg. Skill Disparities and Unequal Family Outcomes 177-212. [Crossref]
263. Amy Farmer, Andrew W. Horowitz. 2015. Strategic non-marital cohabitation: theory and empirical
implications. Journal of Population Economics 28:1, 219-237. [Crossref]
264. Yoram Weiss. Family Theory: Economics of Marriage and Divorce 829-834. [Crossref]
265.Delia Furtado. Ethnic Intermarriage 118-122. [Crossref]
266. Francine D. Blau. Gender, Economics of 757-763. [Crossref]
267. Alícia Adserà, Ana Ferrer. Immigrants and Demography 315-374. [Crossref]
268. Marcel Zentner, Alice H. Eagly. 2015. A sociocultural framework for understanding partner
preferences of women and men: Integration of concepts and evidence. European Review of Social
Psychology 26:1, 328-373. [Crossref]
269. Gustaf Bruze, Michael Svarer, Yoram Weiss. 2015. The Dynamics of Marriage and Divorce. Journal
of Labor Economics 33:1, 123-170. [Crossref]
270. Jane Dokko, Geng Li, Jessica Hayes. 2015. Credit Scores and Committed Relationships. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
271. Chinhui Juhn, Kristin McCue. 2015. Selection and Specialization in the Evolution of Marriage
Earnings Gaps. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
272. Rafael Gonzalez, Miriam Marccn. 2015. Regional Unemployment, Marriage, and Divorce. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
273. Amit Kaplan, Anat Herbst. 2015. Stratified patterns of divorce. Demographic Research 32, 949-982.
[Crossref]
274. L. S. Olah, M. Gahler. 2014. Gender Equality Perceptions, Division of Paid and Unpaid Work, and
Partnership Dissolution in Sweden. Social Forces 93:2, 571-594. [Crossref]
275. Lisa A. Morris, Luisa S. Deprez. 2014. The faltering safety net in a reluctant nation: Women's
economic security at risk in America. Women's Studies International Forum 47, 255-268. [Crossref]
276. Lena Hassani-Nezhad, Anna Sjögren. 2014. Unilateral Divorce for Women and Labor Supply in
the Middle East and North Africa: The Effect of Khul Reform. Feminist Economics 20:4, 113-137.
[Crossref]
277. Hani Mansour, Terra McKinnish. 2014. Couples’ time together: complementarities in production
versus complementarities in consumption. Journal of Population Economics 27:4, 1127-1144. [Crossref]
278. Philip N. Cohen. 2014. Recession and Divorce in the United States, 2008–2011. Population Research
and Policy Review 33:5, 615-628. [Crossref]
279. Wolfgang Frimmel, Martin Halla, Rudolf Winter-Ebmer. 2014. Can Pro-Marriage Policies Work?
An Analysis of Marginal Marriages. Demography 51:4, 1357-1379. [Crossref]
280. H. Elizabeth Peters, Kosali Simon, Jamie Rubenstein Taber. 2014. Marital Disruption and Health
Insurance. Demography 51:4, 1397-1421. [Crossref]
281. Leonard M. Lopoo, Kerri M. Raissian. 2014. U.S. Social Policy and Family Complexity. The
ANNALS of the American Academy of Political and Social Science 654:1, 213-230. [Crossref]
282. Elizabeth Mokyr Horner. 2014. Continued Pursuit of Happily Ever After: Low Barriers to Divorce
and Happiness. Journal of Family and Economic Issues 35:2, 228-240. [Crossref]
283. M. Grinstein-Weiss, K. R. Manturuk, S. Guo, P. Charles, C. Key. 2014. The Impact of
Homeownership on Marriage and Divorce: Evidence from Propensity Score Matching. Social Work
Research 38:2, 73-90. [Crossref]
284. Carrie Yodanis, Sean Lauer. 2014. Is Marriage Individualized? What Couples Actually Do. Journal of
Family Theory & Review 6:2, 184-197. [Crossref]
285. Sarah R. Hayford, Karen Benjamin Guzzo, Pamela J. Smock. 2014. The Decoupling of Marriage
and Parenthood? Trends in the Timing of Marital First Births, 1945-2002. Journal of Marriage and
Family 76:3, 520-538. [Crossref]
286. Anna Matysiak, Marta Styrc, Daniele Vignoli. 2014. The educational gradient in marital disruption:
A meta-analysis of European research findings. Population Studies 68:2, 197-215. [Crossref]
287. Mahito Hayashi. 2014. Urban Poverty and Regulation, New Spaces and Old: Japan and the US in
Comparison. Environment and Planning A: Economy and Space 46:5, 1203-1225. [Crossref]
288. Alexander M. Gelber. 2014. Taxation and the Earnings of Husbands and Wives: Evidence from
Sweden. Review of Economics and Statistics 96:2, 287-305. [Crossref]
289. Lisa Giddings, John M. Nunley, Alyssa Schneebaum, Joachim Zietz. 2014. Birth Cohort and
the Specialization Gap Between Same-Sex and Different-Sex Couples. Demography 51:2, 509-534.
[Crossref]
290. Sheela Kennedy, Steven Ruggles. 2014. Breaking Up Is Hard to Count: The Rise of Divorce in the
United States, 1980–2010. Demography 51:2, 587-598. [Crossref]
291. Héctor Bellido, Miriam Marcén. 2014. Divorce laws and fertility. Labour Economics 27, 56-70.
[Crossref]
292. Wendy D. Manning, Susan L. Brown. American Families 43-60. [Crossref]
293. Juho Härkönen. Divorce 303-322. [Crossref]
294. Eric P. Baumer, Kevin T. Wolff. 2014. Evaluating Contemporary Crime Drop(s) in America, New
York City, and Many Other Places. Justice Quarterly 31:1, 5-38. [Crossref]
295. Alena Bicakova, Stepan Jurajda. 2014. The Quiet Revolution and the Family: Gender Composition
of Tertiary Education and Early Fertility Patterns. SSRN Electronic Journal 40. . [Crossref]
296. Peter A. Savelyev, Kegon Teng Kok Tan. 2014. Personality, Education, and Health-Related Outcomes
of High-Ability Individuals. SSRN Electronic Journal 28. . [Crossref]
297. Seul-ki Shin. 2014. Preferences vs. Opportunities: Racial/Ethnic Intermarriage in the United States.
SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
298. Edoardo Ciscato, Alfred Galichon, Marion Gousse. 2014. Like Attract Like? A Structural Comparison
of Homogamy Across Same-Sex and Different-Sex Households. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
299. Ismael Mourifie, Aloysius Siow. 2014. Cohabitation versus Marriage: Marriage Matching with Peer
Effects. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
300. Rahul Suresh Sapkal. 2014. From Mother to Daughter: Do Equal Inheritance Property Laws Reform
Improve Female Labour Supply, Educational Attainments in India?. SSRN Electronic Journal 91. .
[Crossref]
301. Avidan Milevsky, Kristie Thudium, Jillian Guldin. Romantic Partners 37-56. [Crossref]
302. Sergio Beraldo, Raul Caruso, Gilberto Turati. 2013. Life is now! Time preferences and crime:
Aggregate evidence from the Italian regions. The Journal of Socio-Economics 47, 73-81. [Crossref]
303. Lara Patrício Tavares, Arnstein Aassve. 2013. Psychological distress of marital and cohabitation
breakups. Social Science Research 42:6, 1599-1611. [Crossref]
304. Susan McDaniel, Adebiyi Germain Boco, Sara Zella. 2013. Changing Patterns of Religious Affiliation,
Religiosity, and Marital Dissolution: A 35-Year Study of Three-Generation Families. Journal of
Divorce & Remarriage 54:8, 629-657. [Crossref]
305.Dana E. Prescott. 2013. Social Workers as “Experts” in the Family Court System: Is Evidence-Based
Practice a Missing Link or Host-Created Knowledge?. Journal of Evidence-Based Social Work 10:5,
466-481. [Crossref]
306. M. Bhuller, T. Havnes, E. Leuven, M. Mogstad. 2013. Broadband Internet: An Information
Superhighway to Sex Crime?. The Review of Economic Studies 80:4, 1237-1266. [Crossref]
307. Wolfgang Frimmel, Martin Halla, Rudolf Winter-Ebmer. 2013. Assortative Mating and Divorce:
Evidence from Austrian Register Data. Journal of the Royal Statistical Society Series A: Statistics in
Society 176:4, 907-929. [Crossref]
308. Ingela Alger, Donald Cox. 2013. The evolution of altruistic preferences: mothers versus fathers.
Review of Economics of the Household 11:3, 421-446. [Crossref]
309. Anna Matysiak, Daniele Vignoli. 2013. Diverse Effects of Women’s Employment on Fertility: Insights
From Italy and Poland. European Journal of Population / Revue européenne de Démographie 29:3,
273-302. [Crossref]
310. Jessamyn Schaller. 2013. For richer, if not for poorer? Marriage and divorce over the business cycle.
Journal of Population Economics 26:3, 1007-1033. [Crossref]
311. Bart Victor, Edward F. Fischer, Bruce Cooil, Alfredo Vergara, Abraham Mukolo, Meridith Blevins.
2013. Frustrated Freedom: The Effects of Agency and Wealth on Wellbeing in Rural Mozambique.
World Development 47, 30-41. [Crossref]
312.Delia Furtado, Miriam Marcén, Almudena Sevilla. 2013. Does Culture Affect Divorce? Evidence From
European Immigrants in the United States. Demography 50:3, 1013-1038. [Crossref]
313. Martin Halla. 2013. THE EFFECT OF JOINT CUSTODY ON FAMILY OUTCOMES. Journal
of the European Economic Association 11:2, 278-315. [Crossref]
314. Fenaba R. Addo, Daniel T. Lichter. 2013. Marriage, Marital History, and Black – White Wealth
Differentials Among Older Women. Journal of Marriage and Family 75:2, 342-362. [Crossref]
315. Sergio Beraldo, Raul Caruso, Gilberto Turati. 2013. Life is Now! Time Preferences and Crime:
Aggregate Evidence from the Italian Regions. SSRN Electronic Journal 42. . [Crossref]
316. Jisoo Hwang. 2013. Housewife, 'Gold Miss,' and Equal: The Evolution of Educated Women's Role
in Asia and the U.S. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
317. Melissa Ruby Banzhaf. 2013. When It Rains, It Pours: Under What Circumstances Does Job Loss
Lead to Divorce. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
318. Jay Teachman, Lucky Tedrow, Gina Kim. The Demography of Families 39-63. [Crossref]
319. Martin Halla, Mario Lackner, Johann Scharler. 2013. Does the Welfare State Destroy the Family?
Evidence from OECD Member Countries. SSRN Electronic Journal 43. . [Crossref]
320.DAVID M. BLAU, WILBERT van der KLAAUW. 2013. WHAT DETERMINES FAMILY
STRUCTURE?. Economic Inquiry 51:1, 579-604. [Crossref]
321. SUQIN GE, FANG YANG. 2013. ACCOUNTING FOR THE GENDER GAP IN COLLEGE
ATTAINMENT. Economic Inquiry 51:1, 478-499. [Crossref]
322. Miriam Marcén, José Alberto Molina. 2012. Informal caring-time and caregiver satisfaction. The
European Journal of Health Economics 13:6, 683-705. [Crossref]
323. Shelly Lundberg. 2012. Personality and marital surplus. IZA Journal of Labor Economics 1:1. .
[Crossref]
324. Jeounghee Kim. 2012. Educational Differences in Marital Dissolution: Comparison of White and
African American Women. Family Relations 61:5, 811-824. [Crossref]
325. H. Fisher. 2012. Divorce Property Division Laws and the Decision to Marry or Cohabit. Journal of
Law, Economics, and Organization 28:4, 734-753. [Crossref]
326. Berkay Özcan, Richard Breen. 2012. Marital Instability and Female Labor Supply. Annual Review of
Sociology 38:1, 463-481. [Crossref]
327. Tomas Cvrcek. 2012. America's settling down: How better jobs and falling immigration led to a rise
in marriage, 1880–1930. Explorations in Economic History 49:3, 335-351. [Crossref]
328. Marie-Christine Brault, Bart Meuleman, Piet Bracke. 2012. Depressive symptoms in the Belgian
population: disentangling age and cohort effects. Social Psychiatry and Psychiatric Epidemiology 47:6,
903-915. [Crossref]
329. Marion Leturcq. 2012. Will you civil union me? Taxation and civil unions in France. Journal of Public
Economics 96:5-6, 541-552. [Crossref]
330. Betsey Stevenson, Justin Wolfers. 2012. Subjective and Objective Indicators of Racial Progress. The
Journal of Legal Studies 41:2, 459-493. [Crossref]
331. Éva Beaujouan. 2012. Repartnering in France: The role of gender, age and past fertility. Advances in
Life Course Research 17:2, 69-80. [Crossref]
332. Martin Dribe, Christer Lundh. 2012. Intermarriage, Value Context and Union Dissolution: Sweden
1990–2005. European Journal of Population / Revue européenne de Démographie 28:2, 139-158.
[Crossref]
333. Liat Raz-Yurovich. 2012. Economic Determinants of Divorce Among Dual-Earner Couples: Jews in
Israel. European Journal of Population / Revue européenne de Démographie 28:2, 177-203. [Crossref]
334. John M. Nunley, Joachim Zietz. 2012. The Long-Run Impact of Age Demographics on the U.S.
Divorce Rate. The American Economist 57:1, 65-77. [Crossref]
335. Brian H. Freedman, Luther G. Kalb, Benjamin Zablotsky, Elizabeth A. Stuart. 2012. Relationship
Status Among Parents of Children with Autism Spectrum Disorders: A Population-Based Study.
Journal of Autism and Developmental Disorders 42:4, 539-548. [Crossref]
336. WENDY D. MANNING, JESSICA A. COHEN. 2012. Premarital Cohabitation and Marital
Dissolution: An Examination of Recent Marriages. Journal of Marriage and Family 74:2, 377-387.
[Crossref]
337. Eugenio Proto, Daniel Sgroi, Andrew J. Oswald. 2012. Are happiness and productivity lower among
young people with newly-divorced parents? An experimental and econometric approach. Experimental
Economics 15:1, 1-23. [Crossref]
338. Christopher R. Tamborini, Howard M. Iams, Gayle L. Reznik. 2012. Women’s Earnings Before and
After Marital Dissolution: Evidence from Longitudinal Earnings Records Matched to Survey Data.
Journal of Family and Economic Issues 33:1, 69-82. [Crossref]
339. Michael Malcolm. 2012. A noncooperative marriage model with remarriage. Review of Economics of
the Household 10:1, 133-151. [Crossref]
340. Martin Halla, Johann Scharler. 2012. Marriage, Divorce, and Interstate Risk Sharing*. The
Scandinavian Journal of Economics 114:1, 55-78. [Crossref]
341. Finn Christensen. 2012. The pill and partnerships: the impact of the birth control pill on cohabitation.
Journal of Population Economics 25:1, 29-52. [Crossref]
342. Ayako Kondo. 2012. Gender-specific labor market conditions and family formation. Journal of
Population Economics 25:1, 151-174. [Crossref]
343. Fenaba R. Addo. 2012. Ethnoracial Differences in Early Union Experiences among Young Adult
Women. The Review of Black Political Economy 39:4, 427-444. [Crossref]
344. Patric Hendershott, Kevin Villani. 2012. The Politically Incorrect View of What Made the Financial
Crisis Systemic: Government Housing Policy. Journal of Housing Research 21:1, 15-48. [Crossref]
345. Audrey Light, Yoshiaki Omori. Can Long-Term Cohabiting and Marital Unions be Incentivized?
241-283. [Crossref]
346. Alessandra Voena. 2012. Yours, Mine and Ours: Do Divorce Laws Affect the Intertemporal Behavior
of Married Couples?. SSRN Electronic Journal 122. . [Crossref]
347. Arup Kanti Konar. 2012. Defamiliarizing the Demographic Doomsday Diagram. SSRN Electronic
Journal . [Crossref]
348. Tyler Shumway, Robert Daines. 2012. Pornography and Divorce. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
349. Jordan Neyland. 2012. Wealth Shocks and Executive Compensation: Evidence from CEO Divorce.
SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
350. Kristin E. Smith, Marybeth J. Mattingly. Rural Families in Transition 239-253. [Crossref]
351. Ryan E. Halley, Dorothy B. Durband, William C. Bailey, A. William Gustafson. 2011. A Survey
of Clergy Practices Associated with Premarital Financial Counseling. Journal of Pastoral Care &
Counseling: Advancing theory and professional practice through scholarly and reflective publications 65:4,
1-14. [Crossref]
352.David McAdams. 2011. Performance and Turnover in a Stochastic Partnership. American Economic
Journal: Microeconomics 3:4, 107-142. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
353. Berkay Özcan. 2011. Only the lonely? The influence of the spouse on the transition to selfemployment. Small Business Economics 37:4, 465-492. [Crossref]
354. Graziella Bertocchi, Marianna Brunetti, Costanza Torricelli. 2011. Marriage and other risky assets: A
portfolio approach. Journal of Banking & Finance 35:11, 2902-2915. [Crossref]
355. Todd D. Kendall. 2011. The Relationship Between Internet Access and Divorce Rate. Journal of
Family and Economic Issues 32:3, 449-460. [Crossref]
356. Jonas D. M. Fisher, Martin Gervais. 2011. WHY HAS HOME OWNERSHIP FALLEN AMONG
THE YOUNG?*. International Economic Review 52:3, 883-912. [Crossref]
357. Larry W. Taylor. 2011. The transition to mid-life divorce. Review of Economics of the Household 9:2,
251-271. [Crossref]
358. Anupam B. Jena, Dana P. Goldman. 2011. Growing Internet Use May Help Explain The Rise In
Prescription Drug Abuse In The United States. Health Affairs 30:6, 1192-1199. [Crossref]
359. Graziella Bertocchi. 2011. The enfranchisement of women and the welfare state. European Economic
Review 55:4, 535-553. [Crossref]
360. Paul R. Amato, Brett Beattie. 2011. Does the unemployment rate affect the divorce rate? An analysis
of state data 1960–2005. Social Science Research 40:3, 705-715. [Crossref]
361. Marie Helweg-Larsen, Hilary G. Harding, William M. P. Klein. 2011. Will I Divorce or Have a
Happy Marriage?: Gender Differences in Comparative Optimism and Estimation of Personal Chances
Among U.S. College Students. Basic and Applied Social Psychology 33:2, 157-166. [Crossref]
362. K. Sakata, C.R. McKenzie. 2011. Social security and divorce in Japan. Mathematics and Computers in
Simulation 81:7, 1507-1517. [Crossref]
363. Christopher J. Ferguson, Benjamin Winegard, Bo M. Winegard. 2011. Who is The Fairest One of
All? How Evolution Guides Peer and Media Influences on Female Body Dissatisfaction. Review of
General Psychology 15:1, 11-28. [Crossref]
364. Christina Gibson-Davis. 2011. Mothers but Not Wives: The Increasing Lag Between Nonmarital
Births and Marriage. Journal of Marriage and Family 73:1, 264-278. [Crossref]
365. John A. List, Imran Rasul. Field Experiments in Labor Economics 103-228. [Crossref]
366. Bertrand Marianne. New Perspectives on Gender 1543-1590. [Crossref]
367. Alessandro Cigno. 2011. The Economics of Marriage. Perspektiven der Wirtschaftspolitik
12:Supplement. . [Crossref]
368. Shelly Lundberg. 2011. Psychology and Family Economics. Perspektiven der Wirtschaftspolitik
12:Supplement. . [Crossref]
369.Domenico Tabasso. 2011. With or Without You: Hazard of Divorce and Intra-Household Allocation
of Time. SSRN Electronic Journal 94. . [Crossref]
370. Hani Mansour, Terra McKinnish. 2011. Who Marries Differently-Aged Spouses? Earnings, Ability
and Appearance. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
371. Manudeep Bhuller, Tarjei Havnes, Edwin Leuven, Magne Mogstad. 2011. Broadband Internet: An
Information Superhighway to Sex Crime?. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
372. Betsey Stevenson, Justin Wolfers. 2011. Subjective and Objective Indicators of Racial Progress. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
373. Sergio Beraldo, Raul Caruso, Gilberto Turati. 2011. Life is Now! Time Discounting and Crime:
Evidence from the Italian Regions (2002-2007). SSRN Electronic Journal 40. . [Crossref]
374. Raphaela Hyee. 2011. Education in a Marriage Market Model Without Commitment. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
375. Anne D. D. Boschini, Christina Hakansson, Asa Rosen, Anna Sjogren. 2011. Trading Off or Having
it All? Completed Fertility and Mid-Career Earnings of Swedish Men and Women. SSRN Electronic
Journal . [Crossref]
376.Dana Rotz. 2011. Why Have Divorce Rates Fallen? The Role of Women’s Age at Marriage. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
377. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner, Georgi Kocharkov, Cezar Santos. 2011. Technology and the
Changing Family: A Unified Model of Marriage, Divorce, Educational Attainment and Married
Female Labor-Force Participation. SSRN Electronic Journal 98. . [Crossref]
378. Raphaela Hyee. 2011. Do Marriage Markets Influence the Divorce Hazard?. SSRN Electronic Journal
. [Crossref]
379.Diederik Boertien. 2011. Jackpot? Gender Differences in the Effects of Lottery Wins on Divorce.
SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
380. Nicolas Moreau, Abdel Rahmen El Lahga. The Effects of Marriage on Couples’ Allocation of Time
Between Market and Nonmarket Hours 121-143. [Crossref]
381. Victoria Vernon. 2010. Marriage: for love, for money…and for time?. Review of Economics of the
Household 8:4, 433-457. [Crossref]
382. Greta R Bauer, Nooshin Khobzi, Todd A Coleman. 2010. Herpes simplex virus type 2 seropositivity
and relationship status among U.S. adults age 20 to 49: a population-based analysis. BMC Infectious
Diseases 10:1. . [Crossref]
383. Stephanie Coontz. 2010. Why American Families Need the Census. The ANNALS of the American
Academy of Political and Social Science 631:1, 141-149. [Crossref]
384. Gordon B. Dahl. 2010. Early teen marriage and future poverty. Demography 47:3, 689-718. [Crossref]
385. John M. Nunley, Alan Seals. 2010. The Effects of Household Income Volatility on Divorce. The
American Journal of Economics and Sociology 69:3, 983-1010. [Crossref]
386. Jacqueline Pfeffer Merrill. 2010. An Economist’s View of Marriage. Society 47:3, 234-239. [Crossref]
387. Cahit Guven, Claudia Senik, Holger Stichnoth. 2010. You Can’t Be Happier than Your Wife -
Happiness Gaps and Divorce. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
388. Betsey Stevenson, Justin Wolfers. 2010. Subjective and Objective Indicators of Racial Progress. SSRN
Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
389. Shelly J. Lundberg. 2010. Personality and Marital Surplus. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
390. Adam Seth Levine, Robert H. Frank, Oege Dijk. 2010. Expenditure Cascades. SSRN Electronic
Journal . [Crossref]
391. Christine Velicer, Xingshu Zhu, Scott Vuocolo, Kai-Li Liaw, Alfred Saah. 2009. Prevalence and
Incidence of HPV Genital Infection in Women. Sexually Transmitted Diseases 36:11, 696-703.
[Crossref]
392. S Brismar-Wendel, M Froberg, A Hjerpe, S Andersson, B Johansson. 2009. Age-specific prevalence
of HPV genotypes in cervical cytology samples with equivocal or low-grade lesions. British Journal
of Cancer 101:3, 511-517. [Crossref]
393. Betsey Stevenson,, Justin Wolfers. 2009. The Paradox of Declining Female Happiness. American
Economic Journal: Economic Policy 1:2, 190-225. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
394. Margaret L. Usdansky. 2009. Ambivalent Acceptance of Single‐Parent Families: A Response to
Comments. Journal of Marriage and Family 71:2, 240-246. [Crossref]
395. Libertad González, Tarja K. Viitanen. 2009. The effect of divorce laws on divorce rates in Europe.
European Economic Review 53:2, 127-138. [Crossref]
396. Emily M. Agree, Karen Glaser. Demography of Informal Caregiving 647-668. [Crossref]
397. Jonas D. M. Fisher, Martin Gervais. 2009. Why Has Home Ownership Fallen among the Young?.
SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
398. Suqin Ge, Fang Yang. 2009. Accounting for the Gender Gap in College Attainment. SSRN Electronic
Journal 111. . [Crossref]
399. Audrey Light, Taehyun Ahn. 2009. Divorce as Risky Behavior. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
400. Hans Fehr, Manuel Kallweit, Fabian Kindermann. 2009. Marital Risk, Family Insurance and Public
Policy. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
401. L. E. Pezzin, R. A. Pollak, B. S. Schone. 2008. Parental Marital Disruption, Family Type, and
Transfers to Disabled Elderly Parents. The Journals of Gerontology Series B: Psychological Sciences and
Social Sciences 63:6, S349-S358. [Crossref]
402. K. Glaser, C. Tomassini, R. Stuchbury. 2008. Differences Over Time in the Relationship Between
Partnership Disruptions and Support in Early Old Age in Britain. The Journals of Gerontology Series
B: Psychological Sciences and Social Sciences 63:6, S359-S368. [Crossref]
403.David M. Blau, Wilbert van der Klaauw. 2008. A demographic analysis of the family structure
experiences of children in the United States. Review of Economics of the Household 6:3, 193-221.
[Crossref]
404. F. Xavier Bosch, Ann N. Burchell, Mark Schiffman, Anna R. Giuliano, Silvia de Sanjose, Laia Bruni,
Guillermo Tortolero-Luna, Susanne Kruger Kjaer, Nubia Muñoz. 2008. Epidemiology and Natural
History of Human Papillomavirus Infections and Type-Specific Implications in Cervical Neoplasia.
Vaccine 26, K1-K16. [Crossref]
405.David Deming,, Susan Dynarski,. 2008. The Lengthening of Childhood. Journal of Economic
Perspectives 22:3, 71-92. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
406. Betsey Stevenson, Justin Wolfers. 2008. Happiness Inequality in the United States. The Journal of
Legal Studies 37:S2, S33-S79. [Crossref]
407. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner. 2008. Marriage and Divorce since World War II: Analyzing the
Role of Technological Progress on the Formation of Households. NBER Macroeconomics Annual 23:1,
231-276. [Crossref]
408. Justin Wolfers. 2008. Comment. NBER Macroeconomics Annual 23:1, 291-310. [Crossref]
409. Jeremy Greenwood, Nezih Guner. 2008. Marriage and Divorce Since World War II: Analyzing the
Role of Technological Progress on the Formation of Households. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]